Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE G. NON-BACCALAUREATE SYSTEM

CHAPTER 130. JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 130.001. SUPERVISION BY COORDINATING BOARD, TEXAS COLLEGE AND UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. (a) The Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, referred to as the coordinating board, shall exercise general control of the public junior colleges of Texas.

(b) The coordinating board shall have the responsibility for adopting policies, enacting regulations, and establishing general rules necessary for carrying out the duties with respect to public junior colleges as prescribed by the legislature, and with the advice and assistance of the commissioner of higher education, shall have authority to:

(1) authorize the creation of public junior college districts as provided in the statutes, giving particular attention to the need for a public junior college in the proposed district and the ability of the district to provide adequate local financial support;

(2) dissolve any public junior college district which has failed to establish and maintain a junior college within three years from the date of its authorization;

(3) adopt standards for the operation of public junior colleges and prescribe the rules and regulations for such colleges;

(4) require of each public junior college such reports as deemed necessary in accordance with the coordinating board's rules and regulations; and

(5) establish a standing advisory committee composed of representatives of public junior colleges to provide advice and counsel to the coordinating board with respect to the funding of public junior colleges necessary to carry out this chapter and Chapter 130A.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2993, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.001 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3280, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.0011. PUBLIC JUNIOR COLLEGES; ROLE AND MISSION. Texas public junior colleges shall be two-year institutions primarily serving their local taxing districts and service areas in Texas and offering vocational, technical, and academic courses for certification or associate degrees. Continuing education, remedial and compensatory education consistent with open-admission policies, and programs of counseling and guidance shall be provided. Each institution shall insist on excellence in all academic areas--instruction, research, and public service. Faculty research, using the facilities provided for and consistent with the primary function of each institution, is encouraged. Funding for research should be from private sources, competitively acquired sources, local taxes, and other local revenue.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 2.01, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 130.002. EXTENT OF STATE AND LOCAL CONTROL. All authority not vested by this chapter or by other laws of the state in the coordinating board or in the Central Education Agency is reserved and retained locally in each of the respective public junior college districts or in the governing boards of such junior colleges as provided in the laws applicable.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2993, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.002 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3281, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.0021. CONVEYANCE OF CERTAIN REAL PROPERTY. A public junior college or a public junior college district may donate, exchange, convey, sell, or lease land, improvements, or any other interest in any real property for less than the fair market value of the real property interest if the donation, conveyance, exchange, sale, or lease is being made to a university system and the governing board of the public junior college or the public junior college district also finds that the donation, conveyance, exchange, sale, or lease of the interest promotes a public purpose related to higher education within the service area of the public junior college or the public junior college district.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 296, Sec. 5, eff. May 29, 1999.

Sec. 130.003. STATE APPROPRIATION FOR PUBLIC JUNIOR COLLEGES. (a) There shall be appropriated biennially from money in the state treasury not otherwise appropriated an amount sufficient to supplement local funds for the proper support, maintenance, operation, and improvement of those public junior colleges of Texas that meet the standards prescribed by this chapter. The sum shall be allocated in accordance with Chapter 130A.

(b) To be eligible for and to receive money appropriated under Subsection (a), a public junior college must certify to the coordinating board, in the manner prescribed by coordinating board rule, that the college:

(1) offers a minimum of 24 semester hours of vocational and/or terminal courses;

(2) collects, from each full-time and part-time student enrolled, tuition and other fees in the amounts required by law or in the amounts set by the governing board of the junior college district as authorized by this title;

(3) grants, when properly applied for, the scholarships and tuition exemptions provided for in this code;

(4) for a public junior college established on or after September 1, 1986, levies and collects ad valorem taxes as provided by law for the operation and maintenance of the college; and

(5) has complied with all laws and coordinating board rules for the establishment and operation of a public junior college.

(c) All funds allocated under the provisions of this code, with the exception of those necessary for paying the costs of audits as provided, shall be used exclusively for the purpose of paying salaries of the instructional and administrative forces of the several institutions and the purchase of supplies and materials for instructional purposes.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 52, eff. September 1, 2023.

(e) The primary purpose of each public junior college shall be to provide:

(1) technical programs up to two years in length leading to associate degrees or certificates;

(2) vocational programs leading directly to employment in semi-skilled and skilled occupations;

(3) courses in the core curriculum or a field of study curriculum, as those terms are defined by Section 61.821;

(4) continuing adult education programs for occupational or cultural upgrading;

(5) compensatory education programs designed to fulfill the commitment of an admissions policy allowing the enrollment of disadvantaged students;

(6) a continuing program of counseling and guidance designed to assist students in achieving their individual educational goals;

(7) work force development programs designed to meet local and statewide needs;

(8) adult literacy and other basic skills programs for adults; and

(9) such other purposes as may be prescribed by the coordinating board or local governing boards in the best interest of post-secondary education in this state.

(f) This section does not affect the application of Section 54.231.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2994, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.003 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3281, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3355, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 87, ch. 51, Sec. 7, eff. Aug. 27, 1973; Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1519, ch. 549, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1973; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1379, ch. 550, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 705, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 708, Sec. 16, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.04, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1383, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 805 (S.B. 532), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 52, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.0031. TRANSFERS: WHEN MADE. (a) In consultation with the advisory committee established under Section 130.001(b)(5), the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board by rule shall adopt a payment schedule by which money appropriated to junior college districts under this chapter and Chapter 130A is distributed to those districts.

(b) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board may modify the amount of any installment required under the payment schedule adopted under Subsection (a) to, in accordance with this chapter, Chapter 130A, the General Appropriations Act, or coordinating board rule:

(1) provide the junior college district with the proper amount to which the junior college district may be entitled by law; and

(2) correct errors in the allocation or distribution of funds.

(c) If the amount of an installment under the payment schedule adopted under Subsection (a) is required to be equal to the amount of another installment, the amount of the other installment may be adjusted to provide for that equality. A payment under this section is not invalid because it is not equal to other installments.

Added by Acts 1984, 68th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 10, art. 1, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1984.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.00311. METHODS OF INCLUSION OR PARTICIPATION IN JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT. (a) The following are methods that may be used to be included in or to participate in a junior college district:

(1) the registered voters of territory that is not located in a junior college district may petition to join an existing junior college district or to establish a new junior college district under the other provisions of this chapter; or

(2) a junior college district may enter into an agreement with an entity or community under Section 130.0081 to provide services to the entity or community.

(b) If a political subdivision or part of a political subdivision is not located in a junior college district or has not entered into an agreement under Section 130.0081, a person who resides in that territory and who is a student of a junior college district shall be charged tuition and fees at the rate established under Section 130.0032(d).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1100 (H.B. 2221), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 130.0032. TUITION FOR STUDENTS RESIDING OUTSIDE OF DISTRICT. (a) The governing board of a public junior college district may allow a person who resides outside the district and who owns property subject to ad valorem taxation by the district, or a dependent of the person, to pay tuition at the rate applicable to a student who resides in the district.

(b) The governing board of a public junior college district may allow a person who resides outside the district and in the taxing district of a contiguous public junior college district to pay tuition and fees at the rate applicable to a student who resides in the district.

(b-1) The governing board of a public junior college district that includes at least six campuses shall allow a person who resides outside the district and in the taxing district of a contiguous public junior college district to pay tuition and fees at the rate applicable to a student who resides in the district for enrollment at a campus located within an area in which the person resides that, as of January 1, 2013, is designated as a super neighborhood by a municipality with a population greater than two million.

(c) The governing board of a public junior college district may allow a person who resides outside the district to pay tuition and fees at a rate less than the rate applicable to other persons residing outside the district, but not less than the rate applicable to a student who resides in the district, if the person:

(1) resides within the service area of the district;

(2) does not reside in an independent school district that meets the criteria of the coordinating board for the establishment of a junior college district under Section 130.013; and

(3) demonstrates financial need in accordance with rules adopted by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(d) The governing board of a junior college district shall establish the rate of tuition and fees charged to a student who resides outside the district by considering factors such as:

(1) the sufficiency of the rate to promote taxpayer equity by encouraging areas benefiting from the educational services of the district to participate in financing the education of students from that area;

(2) the extent to which the rate will ensure that the cost to the district of providing educational services to a student who resides outside the district is not financed disproportionately by the taxpayers residing within the district; and

(3) the rate that would generate tuition and fees equal to the total amount of tuition and fees charged to a similarly situated student who resides in the district plus an amount per credit hour determined by dividing the total amount of ad valorem taxes imposed by the district in the tax year preceding the year in which the academic year begins by the total number of credit hours for which the students who were residents of the district enrolled in the district in the preceding academic year.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1383, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1100 (H.B. 2221), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1005 (H.B. 2448), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 130.0033. PILOT PROJECT: REDUCED TUITION FOR CERTAIN COURSES. (a) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall establish a pilot project to measure the impact of reducing tuition for junior college courses offered at times of low enrollment demand in order to promote greater access to higher education and more efficient use of junior college facilities and resources. The coordinating board shall select a reasonable number of public junior colleges to participate in the pilot project.

(b) The governing board of a public junior college selected to participate in the pilot project may charge tuition for a course or courses at a rate established by the governing board that is less than the rate otherwise required by Section 54.051 or other law if the governing board finds that the reduced tuition rate is reasonably necessary to enable the junior college to make efficient use of its facilities or faculty. The finding must be stated in the order or resolution establishing the reduced tuition rate.

(c) Charging tuition at a reduced rate under this section does not affect the right of the public junior college to an allocation of state appropriations under this chapter and Chapter 130A for the contact hours attributable to students paying tuition at the reduced rate.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(23), eff. June 17, 2011.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(23), eff. June 17, 2011.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 318, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(23), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 36, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.0034. TUITION FOR REPEATED COURSES. (a) The governing board of a junior college district may charge a student a higher rate of tuition than the tuition that would otherwise be charged for a course in which the student enrolls if:

(1) the student has previously enrolled in the same course or a course of substantially the same content and level two or more times; and

(2) the student's enrollment in the course is not included in the contact hours used to determine the junior college's allocation of state appropriations under this chapter and Chapter 130A.

(b) This section does not apply to a non-degree-credit developmental course.

(c) The total amount of tuition charged to the student under this section for the repeated course may not exceed the full cost of instruction for the course with respect to the student.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1220 (H.B. 994), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 37, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.0035. PERFORMANCE REPORTS. (a) As soon as practicable after the end of each academic year, a junior college district shall prepare an annual performance report for that academic year. The report shall be prepared in a form that would enable any interested person, including a prospective student, to understand the information in the report and to compare the information to similar information for other junior college districts. A junior college district shall make the report available to any person on request.

(b) The report must include the following information for the junior college district for the academic year covered by the report:

(1) the rate at which students completed courses attempted;

(2) the number and types of degrees and certificates awarded;

(3) the percentage of graduates who passed licensing exams related to the degree or certificate awarded, to the extent the information can be determined;

(4) the number of students or graduates who transfer to or are admitted to a public university;

(5) the passing rates for students required to be tested under Section 51.306;

(6) the percentage of students enrolled who are academically disadvantaged;

(7) the percentage of students enrolled who are economically disadvantaged;

(8) the racial and ethnic composition of the district's student body; and

(9) the percentage of student contact hours taught by full-time faculty.

(c) The Legislative Budget Board shall be responsible for recommending standards for reports under this section, in consultation with junior college districts, the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, and the governor's office of budget and planning.

(d) Expired.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 978, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 60, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 130.0036. REPORT ON STUDENT ENROLLMENT STATUS. (a) In the form and manner and at the times required by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, a junior college district shall report to the coordinating board on the enrollment status of students of the junior college district. The report must include information on:

(1) students seeking a degree;

(2) students seeking a certificate;

(3) students enrolled in workforce continuing education courses;

(4) students enrolled in college credit courses who are not seeking a degree or certificate;

(5) students enrolled in courses for credit to transfer to another institution;

(6) students enrolled in developmental education courses by course level; and

(7) enrollment in other categories as specified by the coordinating board.

(b) In administering this section, the coordinating board shall attempt to avoid duplicating other reporting requirements applicable to junior college districts. The coordinating board shall consult with the governing boards of the state's junior college districts in determining the form, manner, and times of reports under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Sec. 130.004. AUTHORIZED TYPES OF PUBLIC JUNIOR COLLEGES. (a) By complying with the provisions of the appropriate following sections of this chapter a public junior college and/or district of any one of the following classifications may be established:

(1) an independent school district junior college;

(2) a city junior college;

(3) a union junior college;

(4) a county junior college;

(5) a joint-county junior college; and

(6) a public junior college as a part or division of a regional college district.

(b) As used in this chapter, the two general authorized types of junior colleges are:

(1) public junior colleges, which must consist of freshman and sophomore college work taught separately or in conjunction with the junior and senior years of high school and the course of study of such work must be submitted to and approved before being offered by the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System; and

(2) a junior college division of a regional college, as that type of institution is defined in Subchapter F of this chapter, which operates under the laws applicable to public junior colleges in Texas.

(c) All junior college districts, whether established, organized, and/or created, or attempted to be established, organized, and/or created, by vote of the people residing in those districts, or by action of the county school boards, or by action of the county judge, or by action of the commissioners courts, or by action of state educational officers or agencies, or by a combination of any two or more of the same, which districts have previously been recognized by either state or county authorities as junior college districts, are hereby validated in all respects as though they had been duly and legally established in the first instance. Without in any way limiting the generalization of the provisions above,

(1) all additions of territory to or detachments of territory from such junior college districts are hereby in all things validated, whether the same were accomplished or attempted to be accomplished by action of the county school boards, or by action of the county judge, or by action of the commissioners court, or by action of state educational officers or agencies, or by vote of the people residing in such territory, or by a combination of any two or more of the same;

(2) the boundary lines of all such junior college districts are hereby in all things validated; and

(3) all acts of the governing boards of such junior college districts ordering an election or elections, declaring the results of such elections, levying, attempting, or purporting to levy taxes for and on behalf of such districts, and all bonds issued and now outstanding, and all bonds previously voted but not issued, and all tax elections, bond elections, and bond assumption elections are hereby in all things validated; all revenue bonds issued and outstanding and all revenue bonds authorized but not yet issued for and on behalf of such districts are hereby in all things validated.

(d) Subsection (c) of this section shall not apply to any district which has previously been declared invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction of Texas, nor shall it apply to any district which is now involved in litigation in any district court of Texas, the court of civil appeals, or the Supreme Court of Texas, in which litigation the validity of the organization or creation of such district or of the addition of territory to or detachment of territory from such districts is attacked, or to any district involved in proceedings now pending before the coordinating board in which proceedings the validity of the organization or creation of such district or of the addition of territory to or detachment of territory from such district is attacked.

(e) The establishment of any new public junior college campus within an existing junior college district or the establishment of any new junior college district shall be approved by the Legislative Budget Board if the establishment occurs during a time when the legislature is not in session. The legislature shall approve the establishment of any new public junior college campus within an existing junior college district or the establishment of any new junior college district if proposed during or within three months prior to a legislative session.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2994, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.004 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3281, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.005. CHANGE OF NAME TO COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT. (a) The legislature hereby declares that the purpose of this section is to recognize that junior colleges are in fact comprehensive community colleges which serve their communities not only through university-parallel programs but also by means of occupational programs and other programs of community interest and need.

(b) The board of trustees of any junior college district may by resolution duly adopted change the name of such district by substituting the word "community" for the word "junior" in such name. A copy of such resolution duly certified by the secretary of the board of trustees shall be filed with the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System. Such change in name shall become effective upon the filing of such resolution with the said coordinating board. Thereafter all references to such district in all official actions, communications and records shall be by use of such new name.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3344, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 144, ch. 75, Sec. 1, eff. May 7, 1973.

Sec. 130.0051. OTHER CHANGE OF NAME BY JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT. (a) The board of trustees of a junior college district by resolution may change the name of the district or a college within the district, unless the change would cause the district or college to have the same or substantially the same name as an existing district, college, or other public or private institution of higher education in this state.

(b) The board of trustees shall file with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board a copy of a resolution adopted under Subsection (a) that is certified by the secretary of the board of trustees. The name change is effective on the date the resolution is filed with the coordinating board. After a name change is filed, the college or district shall use the new name in all official actions, communications, or records.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 570, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 38, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.006. COURSE HELD OUTSIDE DISTRICT. (a) The trustees of an independent school district located in a county contiguous to, but not a part of, a community college district and the governing board of the community college district may enter into a contract providing for the community college to hold college courses in the school district's facilities.

(b) The contract must be approved by resolution of the governing boards of the community college district and the school district.

(c) For purposes of state funding, a course held in the school district facilities is considered to be a course held in the community college district if the course:

(1) has been approved by a regional higher education council recognized by rule of the coordinating board and in which the district has been designated a member by the coordinating board; and

(2) is approved by the coordinating board as an out-of-district course for the community college district.

(d) Any statutory or regulatory requirement of local support of a community college program is satisfied by the school district providing its facilities without charge to the community college if the total community college enrollment in the school district does not exceed 1,000 full-time students, or the equivalent.

(e) Either party may terminate a contract under this section by giving the other party at least one year's written notice.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1692, ch. 318, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983.

Sec. 130.007. ENDOWMENT FUND. (a) The board of trustees of a public junior college may establish an endowment fund outside the state treasury in a depository selected by the board of trustees.

(b) The board of trustees may deposit local funds collected by the board to the credit of the endowment fund.

(c) The board of trustees may accept gifts and grants from any public or private source for the endowment fund.

(d) The endowment fund consists of local funds deposited to the credit of the endowment fund, gifts, grants, and income from investing the endowment fund.

(e) The board of trustees may invest the endowment fund in securities, bonds, and other investments that the board considers prudent. In making investments under this section, the board shall exercise the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing that a person of ordinary prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercises in the management of the person's own affairs.

(f) The board may not spend any money deposited in the endowment fund as local funds, gifts, or grants but may spend any income from investing the endowment fund for the operation or maintenance of the junior college.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 391, Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 1993.

Sec. 130.008. COURSES FOR JOINT HIGH SCHOOL AND JUNIOR COLLEGE CREDIT. (a) Under an agreement with a school district or, in the case of a private high school, with the organization or other person that operates the high school, a public junior college may offer a course in which a student attending a high school operated in this state by the school district, organization, or other person may enroll and for which the student may simultaneously receive both:

(1) course credit toward the student's high school academic requirements; and

(2) course credit as a student of the junior college, if the student has been admitted to the junior college or becomes eligible to enroll in and is subsequently admitted to the junior college.

(a-1) A course offered for joint high school and junior college credit under this section must be:

(1) in the core curriculum of the public junior college;

(2) a career and technical education course; or

(3) a foreign language course.

(a-2) Subsection (a-1) does not apply to a course offered for joint high school and junior college credit to a student as part of the early college education program established under Section 29.908 or any other early college program that assists a student in earning a certificate or an associate degree while in high school.

(a-3) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in coordination with the Texas Education Agency, shall adopt rules to implement Subsections (a-1) and (a-2). In adopting those rules, the coordinating board shall use the negotiated rulemaking procedures under Chapter 2008, Government Code, and consult with relevant stakeholders.

(b) The junior college may waive all or part of the tuition and fees for a high school student enrolled in a course for which the student may receive joint credit under this section.

(c) The contact hours attributable to the enrollment of a high school student in a course offered for joint high school and junior college credit under this section, excluding a course for which the student attending high school may receive course credit toward the physical education curriculum requirement under Section 28.002(a)(2)(C), shall be included in the contact hours used to determine the junior college's allocation of the state money appropriated and distributed to public junior colleges under this chapter and Chapter 130A, even if the junior college waives all or part of the tuition or fees for the student under Subsection (b).

(d) A public junior college may enter into an agreement with a school district, organization, or other person that operates a high school to offer a course as provided by this section regardless of whether the high school is located within the service area of the junior college district.

(e) In admitting or enrolling high school students in a course offered for joint high school and junior college credit under Subsection (a), a public junior college must apply the same criteria and conditions to each student wishing to enroll in the course without regard to whether the student attends a public school or a private or parochial school, including a home school. For purposes of this section, a student who attends a school that is not formally organized as a high school and is at least 16 years of age is considered to be attending a high school.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 90 , Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2015.

(g) A course offered for joint high school and junior college credit under this section must be taught by a qualified instructor approved or selected by the public junior college. For purposes of this subsection, an instructor is qualified if the instructor holds:

(1) a doctoral or master's degree in the discipline that is the subject of the course;

(2) a master's degree in another discipline with a concentration that required completion of a minimum of 18 graduate semester hours in the discipline that is the subject of the course; or

(3) for a course that is offered in an associate degree program and that is not designed for transfer to a baccalaureate degree program:

(A) a degree described by Subdivision (1) or (2);

(B) a baccalaureate degree in the discipline that is the subject of the course; or

(C) an associate degree and demonstrated competencies in the discipline that is the subject of the course, as determined by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(g-1) A public junior college with a service area located wholly or partly in a county with a population of more than three million shall enter into an agreement with each school district located wholly or partly in a county with a population of more than three million to offer one or more courses as provided by this section. A student enrolled in a school district to which this subsection applies may enroll in a course at any junior college that has entered into an agreement with the district to offer the course under this subsection.

(h) Not later than the 60th day after receipt, a public junior college shall approve or reject an application for approval to teach a course at a high school that is submitted by an instructor employed by the school district, organization, or other person that operates the high school with which the junior college entered into an agreement under this section to offer the course.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 195, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 297, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 908, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 220, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1070, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 453 (H.B. 2480), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (S.B. 419), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 77(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 78(a)(6), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 90 (H.B. 505), Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 797 (H.B. 2812), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 7, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1177 (S.B. 1004), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 6.006, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (S.B. 1091), Sec. 3, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 39, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.0081. AGREEMENT WITH JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT. (a) A junior college district may enter into an agreement with any person, including an employer, political subdivision, or other entity, to provide educational services. The agreement must provide for the entity to cover at least any cost to the district of providing the services that exceeds the amount of tuition and fees that would be charged to a student who resides in the district and is enrolled in a substantially similar course.

(b) Students who are enrolled in a course under the agreement are entitled to pay tuition and fees at the rate applicable to a student who resides in the district.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1100 (H.B. 2221), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 130.009. UNIFORM DATES FOR ADDING OR DROPPING COURSE. (a) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board by rule shall establish uniform final dates, counted from the first class day of an academic semester or term, for adding or dropping a course conducted by a public junior college. The uniform dates apply to each public junior college in this state.

(b) A student may not enroll in a course after a uniform final date for adding a course established under this section. A student is not entitled to a refund of any tuition or fees for a course that the student drops after a uniform final date for dropping a course established under this section.

(c) The rules may provide for different dates for academic semesters or terms of different durations.

(d) Expired.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 459, Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 1995. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 130.008 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 130.010. PURCHASING CONTRACTS. (a) The provisions of Subchapter B, Chapter 44, relating to the purchase of goods and services under contract by a school district apply to the purchase of goods and services under contract by a junior college district.

(b) To the extent of any conflict, the provisions of Subchapter B, Chapter 44, prevail over any other law relating to the purchase of goods and services by a junior college district.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1383, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999.

Sec. 130.0101. ACQUISITION OF LIBRARY MATERIALS. (a) In this section, "library goods and services" means:

(1) serial and journal subscriptions, including electronic databases, digital content, and information products;

(2) other library materials and resources, including books, e-books, and media not available under a statewide contract and papers;

(3) library services, including periodical jobber and binding services not available under a statewide contract;

(4) equipment and supplies specific to the storage and access of library content; and

(5) library or resource-sharing programs operated by the Texas State Library and Archives Commission.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law governing purchasing by a junior college district, including Section 130.010 or Subchapter B, Chapter 44, a junior college district may purchase, license, or otherwise acquire library goods and services in any manner authorized by law for the purchase, license, or acquisition of library goods and services by a public senior college or university, as defined by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1549, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 130.010 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(26), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 336 (H.B. 962), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 130.0102. MEXICAN AMERICAN STUDIES PROGRAM OR COURSE WORK. The governing board of a public junior college district located in one or more counties with a substantial and growing Mexican American population shall evaluate the demand for and feasibility of establishing a Mexican American studies program or other course work in Mexican American studies at one or more junior colleges in the district. With approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, the governing board may establish a Mexican American studies program or other course work in Mexican American studies at any of those colleges if the governing board determines that such a program or course work is desirable and feasible.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 51, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 130.0103. DUAL USAGE EDUCATIONAL COMPLEX. (a) The board of trustees of a junior college district may establish and operate a dual usage educational complex to provide a shared facility for the educational activities of the district and other participating entities. The board of trustees may enter into a cooperative agreement governing the operation and use of the complex with the governing bodies of one or more of the following entities:

(1) a county, municipality, or school district located in whole or in part in the service area of the junior college district; or

(2) another institution of higher education with a campus or other educational facility located in the same state uniform service region as adopted by the coordinating board.

(b) The junior college district shall coordinate and supervise the operation of the complex. The use and the costs associated with the establishment and operation of the complex shall be shared by the district and the other participating entities under the terms of the cooperative agreement.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 968 (H.B. 1737), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 130.0104. MULTIDISCIPLINARY STUDIES ASSOCIATE DEGREE PROGRAM. (a) The governing board of each public junior college district shall establish a multidisciplinary studies associate degree program at each junior college in the district.

(b) A multidisciplinary studies associate degree program established at a junior college under this section must require a student to successfully complete:

(1) the junior college's core curriculum adopted under Section 61.822(b); and

(2) after completion of the core curriculum under Subdivision (1), the courses selected by the student in the student's degree plan completed under Subsection (c).

(c) In complying with the requirements regarding the filing of a degree plan under Section 51.9685, a student enrolled in a multidisciplinary studies associate degree program established under this section must meet with an academic advisor to complete a degree plan that:

(1) accounts for all remaining credit hours required for the completion of the degree program; and

(2) emphasizes:

(A) the student's transition to a particular four-year college or university that the student chooses; and

(B) preparations for the student's intended field of study or major at the four-year college or university.

(d) The coordinating board shall adopt rules as necessary for the administration of this section, including rules ensuring that:

(1) a multidisciplinary studies associate degree program is established at each public junior college; and

(2) the common application form adopted under Section 51.762 contains a description of multidisciplinary studies associate degree programs established under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1186 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 438 (S.B. 1324), Sec. 2, eff. June 4, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1210 (S.B. 25), Sec. 11, eff. June 14, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1305 (H.B. 3808), Sec. 8, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 130.0105. COMMERCIAL DRIVER'S LICENSE TRAINING PROGRAM; CERTAIN CURRICULUM REQUIREMENTS. (a) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board by rule shall require each public junior college offering a commercial driver's license training program to include as a part of that program education and training on the recognition and prevention of human trafficking.

(b) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in collaboration with the office of the attorney general, shall establish the content of the education and training required by this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 21 (S.B. 128), Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2017.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 685 (H.B. 29), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 130.0106. OCCUPATIONAL AND LIFE SKILLS ASSOCIATE DEGREE PROGRAM. (a) The governing board of the Lone Star College System District may establish an occupational and life skills associate degree program at each junior college in the district.

(b) An occupational and life skills associate degree program established at a junior college under this section must require a student to successfully complete:

(1) an appropriate curriculum of required courses for the degree program adopted by the governing board of the junior college district; and

(2) additional courses selected by the student in the student's degree plan.

(c) Section 61.05151(a) does not apply to an associate degree program established under this section.

(d) The coordinating board shall adopt rules as necessary for the administration of this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 881 (H.B. 3165), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT OR CITY JUNIOR COLLEGE

Sec. 130.011. ESTABLISHMENT OF INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT OR CITY JUNIOR COLLEGE. (a) An independent school district junior college may be established by any independent school district or city which has assumed control of its schools meeting the requirements set out in Section 130.032 of this code and subject to the findings of the coordinating board under Section 130.013.

(b) Any such college district established and maintained as provided in this chapter shall be known as a junior college district.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2996, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.011 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3283, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 302, Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 1985.

Sec. 130.012. PETITION TO ESTABLISH. (a) Whenever it is proposed to establish a junior college district in any type of unit authorized by Section 130.011 of this code, a petition praying for an election, signed by not less than 10 percent of the qualified electors of the proposed district shall be presented to the school board of trustees of the district or city, which shall:

(1) pass upon the legality and genuineness of the petition; and

(2) forward the petition, if approved, to the coordinating board.

(b) Any petition authorized by this section shall also incorporate a request for the proper authorities, in the event an election is ordered for the creation of such district, to submit at the same election the questions of issuing bonds and levying bond taxes, and levying maintenance taxes, in the event the district is created, not to exceed the limits provided in Section 130.122 of this code.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2996, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.012 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3283, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 302, Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 1985.

Sec. 130.013. ORDER TO ESTABLISH. It shall be the duty of the coordinating board with the advice of the commissioner of higher education to determine whether or not the conditions set forth in Sections 130.012 and 130.032 of this code have been complied with, and also whether, considering the geographic location of colleges already established, it is feasible and desirable to establish the proposed junior college district. In the exercise of this authority the board shall develop and publish criteria to be used as a basis for determining the need for a public junior college in the proposed district. The board shall determine whether programs in a proposed institution would create unnecessary duplication or seriously harm programs in existing community college districts. It shall be the duty of the coordinating board to consider the needs and the welfare of the state as a whole, as well as the welfare of the community involved. The decision of the coordinating board shall be final and shall be transmitted through the commissioner of higher education to the local school board, along with the order of the coordinating board authorizing further procedure in the establishment of the junior college district, if the coordinating board endorses its establishment.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2996, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.013 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3283, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 302, Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 1985.

Sec. 130.014. ELECTION. (a) If the coordinating board approves of the establishment of the junior college district, it shall then be the duty of the local school board to enter an order for an election to be held in the proposed territory at the next authorized election date as provided in Article 2.01b of the Election Code, to determine whether or not such junior college district shall be created and formed and to submit the questions of issuing bonds and levying bond taxes, and levying maintenance taxes, in the event the district is created. Such order shall:

(1) contain a description of the metes and bounds of the junior college district to be formed; and

(2) fix the date for the election.

(b) If a majority of the electors voting at the election shall be in favor of the creation of a junior college district, the district shall be deemed to be formed and created. The local school board shall make a canvass of the returns and declare the result of the election within 10 days after holding the election, and enter an order on the minutes of the board as to the result of the election.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2997, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.014 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3284, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 302, Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 1985.

Sec. 130.015. CONTROL OF INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT OR CITY JUNIOR COLLEGE. A junior college established by an independent school district or city that has assumed control of schools already validated or established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may be governed, administered, and controlled by and under the direction of the board of trustees of that independent or city school district.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2997, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.015 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3284, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.016. SEPARATE BOARD OF TRUSTEES IN CERTAIN INSTANCES. (a) A junior college established by an independent school district or city that has assumed control of schools already validated or established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may be governed, administered, and controlled by and under the direction of a separate board of trustees, which may be placed in authority by either of the following procedures:

(1) the board of trustees of an independent school district or city school district which has the management, control, and operation of a junior college may divest itself of the management, control, and operation of that junior college so maintained and operated by the school board by appointing for the junior college district a separate board of trustees of nine members; or

(2) the board of trustees of any independent school district or city school district which has the control and management of a junior college may be divested of its control and management of that junior college by the procedure prescribed in Section 130.017 of this code.

(b) If the board of trustees of an independent school district that divests itself of the management, control, and operation of a junior college district under this section or under Section 130.017 of this code was authorized by Subsection (e) of Section 20.48 of this code to dedicate a portion of its tax levy to the junior college district before the divestment, the junior college district may levy an ad valorem tax from and after the divestment. In the first two years in which the junior college district levies an ad valorem tax, the tax rate adopted by the governing body may not exceed the rate that, if applied to the total taxable value submitted to the governing body under Section 26.04, Tax Code, would impose an amount equal to the amount of taxes of the school district dedicated to the junior college under Subsection (e) of Section 20.48 of this code in the last dedication before the divestment. In subsequent years, the tax rate of the junior college district is subject to Section 26.07, Tax Code.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2997, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.016 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3284, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 556, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 130.017. PETITION AND ELECTION TO DIVEST SCHOOL BOARD OF AUTHORITY. (a) On a petition signed by 10 percent of the qualified electors of the independent school district or city school district, the board of trustees within 30 days shall call an election after the petition has been duly presented on the proposition of whether the school board of trustees shall be divested of its authority as governing board of such junior college district.

(b) At the election called under Subsection (a) of this section, the board of trustees shall also include a separate proposition on whether the junior college district may levy ad valorem taxes.

(c) The board of trustees shall, within 30 days after the official canvass of the election, appoint for the junior college district a separate board of trustees as provided by this code to serve as the governing board of the junior college district if the majority of the votes in the election under this section are cast in favor of both propositions. If a majority of the votes in the election are cast against either proposition, the board may not divest its authority as the governing board of the junior college district unless both propositions are approved at a subsequent election. A subsequent election on the propositions may not be held before the first anniversary of the election date.

(d) The separate governing board of the junior college district may levy and collect taxes in accordance with Subchapter G of this chapter at the approved rate without an additional election.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2997, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.017 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3284, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 284, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 130.018. SEPARATE BOARD OF TRUSTEES--TERMS, ETC. In the event a separate board of trustees for the junior college district is appointed under either procedure set out in Section 130.016 or Section 130.017 of this code, the board of trustees, consisting of nine members, shall be organized and constituted pursuant to the provisions of Section 130.082 of this code, and be governed by the provisions thereof.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2998, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.018 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3285, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.019. SEPARATE BOARD OF TRUSTEES; AD VALOREM TAXES. A board of trustees of an independent school district or city school district that has the management, control, and operation of a junior college district may not divest itself of that management, control, and operation of the junior college district under Section 130.016 of this code or have the management, control, and operation of the junior college district divested under Section 130.017 of this code, unless the junior college district has the authority to levy ad valorem taxes for the maintenance of the junior college district or acquires that authority at an election held under Section 130.017.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 284, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER C. UNION, COUNTY, OR JOINT-COUNTY JUNIOR COLLEGES

Sec. 130.031. ESTABLISHMENT OF UNION, COUNTY, OR JOINT-COUNTY JUNIOR COLLEGE. The following types of junior colleges may be established in the following units:

(1) a union junior college district may be established by two or more contiguous independent school districts or two or more contiguous common school districts or a combination composed of one or more independent school districts with one or more common school districts of contiguous territory meeting the requirements set out in Section 130.032 of this code;

(2) a county junior college district may be established by any county meeting the requirements set out in Section 130.032 of this code; and

(3) a joint-county junior college district may be established by any combination of contiguous counties in the state meeting the requirements set out in Section 130.032 of this code.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2998, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.031 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3285, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.0312. VALIDATION OF CERTAIN ACTS AND PROCEEDINGS. (a) All governmental acts and proceedings of South Texas Community College not excepted from the application of this section by another provision of this section that were taken before March 1, 1997, are validated as of the dates on which they occurred.

(b) This section does not validate any governmental act or proceeding that, under the statutes of this state in effect at the time the act or proceeding occurred, constituted an offense punishable as a misdemeanor or a felony.

(c) The acts and proceedings relating to the confirmation proceedings of South Texas Community College are validated as of the date of the confirmation or a good faith attempt at confirmation. The confirmation of South Texas Community College under Section 130.0311 may not be held invalid by the fact of any procedural defects in the election proceedings or confirmation proceedings required under Section 130.0311.

(d) All governmental acts and proceedings of the board of trustees of South Texas Community College or of an officer or employee of the college during the transfer of the property or obligations from the McAllen extension center of the Texas State Technical College System to South Texas Community College and each act or proceeding taken or conducted since the confirmation of South Texas Community College are validated as of the dates on which they occurred.

(e) This section does not apply to any matter that on the effective date of this section:

(1) is involved in litigation if the litigation ultimately results in the matter being held invalid by a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction; or

(2) has been held invalid by a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 247, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1997.

Sec. 130.032. RESTRICTIONS. In order for any territorial unit set out in Sections 130.011 and 130.031 of this code to establish the applicable type of junior college, the proposed district must have a taxable property valuation of not less than $2.5 billion in the next preceding year and a total scholastic population of not less than 15,000 in the next preceding school year.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2998, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.032 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3285, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 302, Sec. 2, eff. June 7, 1985.

Sec. 130.033. PETITION TO ESTABLISH. (a) Whenever it is proposed to establish a junior college of any type specified in Section 130.031 of this code a petition praying for an election therefor shall be presented in the applicable manner as prescribed in Subsections (b)-(d) of this section.

(b) In the case of a union junior college district, the petition shall be signed by not fewer than 10 percent of the registered voters of each of the school districts within the territory of the proposed junior college district and shall be presented to the county school board or county school boards of the respective counties if the territory encompasses more than one county; but if there is no county school board, the petition shall be presented to the commissioners court of the county or counties involved.

(c) In the case of a county junior college district, the petition shall be signed by not fewer than 10 percent of the registered voters of the proposed college district and shall be presented to the county school board of the county; but if there is no county school board, the petition shall be presented to the commissioners court of the county.

(d) In case of a joint-county junior college district, the petition shall be signed by not fewer than 10 percent of the registered voters of each of the proposed counties and shall be presented to the respective county school boards of the counties to be included in the proposed district; in case there is no county school board, the petition shall be presented to the commissioners court of the county or counties involved.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2999, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.033 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3286, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 87, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 130.034. TAX LEVY. Any petition authorized by Sections 130.011 and 130.033 of this code shall also incorporate therein a request for the proper authorities, in the event an election is ordered for the creation of such district, to submit at the same election the questions of issuing bonds and levying bond taxes, and levying maintenance taxes, in the event the district is created, not to exceed the limits provided in Section 130.122 of this code.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2999, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.034 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3286, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 302, Sec. 2, eff. June 7, 1985.

Sec. 130.035. LEGALITY OF PETITION. It shall be the duty of the county school board or boards or the commissioners court or courts petitioned in compliance with Section 130.033 of this code to:

(1) pass upon the legality of the petition and the genuineness of the same; and

(2) forward the petition, so approved, to the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2999, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.035 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3286, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.036. ORDER TO ESTABLISH. It shall be the duty of the coordinating board, with the advice of the commissioner of higher education to determine whether or not the conditions set forth in the preceding sections of this chapter have been complied with, and also whether, considering the geographic location of colleges already established, it is feasible and desirable to establish a junior college district. In the exercise of this authority the board shall develop and publish criteria to be used as a basis for determining the need for a public junior college in the proposed district. The board shall determine whether programs in a proposed institution would create unnecessary duplication or seriously harm programs in existing community college districts. It shall be the duty of the coordinating board in making its decision to consider the needs and the welfare of the state as a whole, as well as the welfare of the community involved. The decision of the coordinating board shall be transmitted through the commissioner of higher education to the county school board or boards or the commissioners court or courts, as the case may be, along with the order of the coordinating board authorizing further procedure in the establishment of the junior college district.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2999, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.036 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3287, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 302, Sec. 2, eff. June 7, 1985.

Sec. 130.037. CALLING ELECTION; SUBMISSION OF QUESTIONS. If the coordinating board approves the establishment of the junior college district, it shall then be the duty of the commissioners court or courts to enter an order for an election to be held in the proposed territory at the next authorized election date as provided in Article 2.01b of the Election Code, to determine whether or not such junior college district be created and formed and to submit the questions of issuing bonds and levying bond taxes, and levying maintenance taxes, in the event the district is created. The order shall contain a description of the metes and bounds of the junior college district to be formed and fix the date of the election.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3000, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.037 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3287, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 302, Sec. 2, eff. June 7, 1985.

Sec. 130.038. ELECTION. A majority of the electors in the proposed district, voting in the election, shall determine the question of creation of the junior college district submitted in the order, the election of the original trustees, and the questions of issuing bonds and levying taxes. A majority of the electors voting in such election shall determine such questions submitted in the order. In the case of a joint-county junior college district, or a union junior college district, the election shall, by mutual agreement of the court or courts, be held on the same day throughout the proposed district.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3000, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.038 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3287, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 302, Sec. 2, eff. June 7, 1985.

Sec. 130.039. ELECTION RETURNS, CANVASS, AND RESULT. (a) The commissioners court or courts within 10 days after holding of an election shall make a canvass of the returns and declare the results of the election.

(b) The court or courts shall enter an order on the minutes of the court or courts as to the results.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3000, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.039 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3287, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.040. BOARD OF TRUSTEES: UNION, COUNTY, OR JOINT-COUNTY JUNIOR COLLEGE. A union junior college, a county junior college, or a joint-county junior college shall be governed, administered, and controlled by and under the direction of a board of trustees of seven members unless the number of members is increased as authorized by Section 130.082(d).

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3000, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.040 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3288, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1324, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2001.

Sec. 130.041. ELECTION OF TRUSTEES OF UNION, COUNTY, AND JOINT-COUNTY JUNIOR COLLEGE. The original trustees of a union or a county junior college shall be elected at large from the junior college district by the qualified voters of the district under the rules and regulations provided for in Section 130.042 of this code.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3000, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.041 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3288, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.042. ORIGINAL BOARD. (a) The original trustees shall be elected at the same election at which the creation of the district is determined.

(b) Any candidate desiring to be voted upon as a first trustee shall present a petition to the commissioners court or courts within three days before the order authorizing the election is issued by the commissioners court or courts, and shall accompany his petition with a petition signed by not less than two percent of the qualified voters in the district, requesting that his name be placed on the ticket as a candidate for trustee.

(c) The seven candidates for junior college trustee receiving the highest number of votes at the election shall be declared trustees of the district.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3001, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.042 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3288, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.043. ORGANIZATION. After the election of the original trustees, the board of trustees shall be organized and constituted, pursuant to the provisions of Section 130.082 of this code and be governed by the provisions thereof.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3001, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.043 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3288, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.044. ELECTION OF TRUSTEES BY THE POSITION METHOD. (a) The board of trustees of a district may, by a majority vote of the trustees, if a quorum is present and voting, adopt a numbered position system of electing members to the board.

(b) If the board adopts a numbered position system, candidates are voted on and elected separately for positions on the board according to the number of the position to which they seek election. The official ballots shall contain:

(1) the phrase "Official Ballot for the Purpose of Electing Trustees";

(2) the name of the junior college district;

(3) the number of each position to be filled; and

(4) the list of candidates under the position to which they seek election.

(c) Within 10 days from the date of adoption of the numbered position system, the trustees shall determine by lot which position each will hold on the board. The members in Class 1 shall draw for positions one and two; the members in Class 2 shall draw for positions three and four; and the members in Class 3 shall draw for positions five, six, and seven.

(d) A person desiring election to a numbered position on the board must, not later than 5 p.m. of the 45th day before the date of the election, file with the board of trustees a written application, designating the number of the position on the board of trustees for which he desires to become a candidate, and requesting that his name be placed on the ballot. An application may not be filed earlier than the 30th day before the date of the filing deadline. Each candidate who files an application is entitled to have his name printed on the official ballot beneath the number of the position designated in his application. A person who fails to file the application required by this section may not have his name printed on the official ballot. A candidate is eligible to have his name printed on the ballot under only one position to be filled at the election.

(e) In the election each voter may vote for only one candidate for each numbered position. The candidate receiving the most votes for each numbered position voted on in the election is entitled to serve as a trustee on the board, in the position to which he is elected.

(f) Notice of an election in a district must be given in the manner and for the time required under the law authorizing the creation of the district, except where there is a conflict with the provisions of this section, then this section is controlling.

(g) The board of trustees of a district with a population greater than one million may require that an application filed under Subsection (d) be accompanied by a filing fee not to exceed $200 as determined by the board or, instead of the filing fee, a petition signed by a number of registered voters of the district not to exceed 200 as determined by the board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3288, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 508, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1149 (H.B. 2956), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER D. CHANGES IN DISTRICT BOUNDARIES

Sec. 130.061. EXTENSION OF BOUNDARIES OF A JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT COEXTENSIVE WITH AN INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT. The district boundaries of an independent school district junior college shall automatically be extended so that the boundary lines of the two districts, independent school district and junior college district, shall remain identical when:

(1) the junior college district was created with the same boundary lines as an independent school district;

(2) the boundaries of the independent school district are extended by consolidation, attachment of territory, or otherwise; and

(3) the board of trustees of the independent school district is also the governing board of the junior college.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3001, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.061 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3289, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.062. ENLARGED DISTRICT: CREATION; RESOLUTION; ORDER. (a) If the creation of the junior college district and the extension of the boundaries of the independent school district both occurred prior to March 17, 1950, the added territory of the independent school district may be brought into the junior college district in the manner prescribed by this section.

(b) A petition requesting that such territory be added to the junior college district signed by a majority of the registered voters of the territory may be presented to the governing board of the junior college district.

(c) The board shall determine whether the petition is signed by the required majority and if such determination is affirmative and if the board shall also determine that the facilities of the junior college district may be extended to cover adequately the scholastics of the added territory, the board shall pass an order admitting such territory. The order shall describe by metes and bounds the junior college district as extended; and a copy of the order shall be filed with the county superintendent. Thereafter, the territory shall be a part of the junior college district for all intents and purposes.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3001, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.062 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3289, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 88, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 130.063. EXTENSION OF JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT BOUNDARIES. (a) Subject to Subsection (b), territory may be annexed to a junior college district by contract under Section 130.064 or election under Section 130.065, if the territory:

(1) is contiguous to the annexing junior college district; or

(2) is located in the service area of the annexing district established under Subchapter J.

(b) Territory may be annexed to a junior college district as provided by this section only if the territory is located wholly within a single school district, county, or municipality. This subsection does not prohibit a junior college district from conducting annexation elections or other annexation procedures for more than one territory at the same time.

(c) A junior college district may not annex territory under this section that is included in the boundaries of another junior college district.

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (e), a junior college district may not annex territory under this section if a campus of the Texas State Technical College System is located:

(1) within the county in which the territory is located; and

(2) outside the junior college district.

(e) This section does not prevent a junior college district from annexing territory located in Brown County, Comal County, Denton County, Guadalupe County, or Williamson County.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3002, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.063 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3290, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3056, ch. 802, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1397, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1100 (H.B. 2221), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1076 (H.B. 3332), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 528 (H.B. 3287), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 130.064. ANNEXATION BY CONTRACT. If the annexation is by contract, a petition shall be presented to the governing board of any junior college district, executed by all property owners of all property situated in the territory proposed for annexation. The petition shall contain a legally sufficient description of the territory proposed for annexation. The governing board of the junior college district, if it deems the annexation to be in the best interest of the district, may effect the annexation by:

(1) entering its order authorizing the annexation of the territory by contract; and

(2) then entering into a written agreement duly executed and acknowledged by all persons, corporations, and entities owning property within the territory.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3002, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.064 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3290, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.065. ANNEXATION BY ELECTION. (a) On presentation to the governing board of a junior college district of a petition proposing the annexation of territory to the district, the governing board may call an election on the question of annexing the territory. The petition must:

(1) contain an accurate description of the territory proposed for annexation; and

(2) be signed by a number of registered voters in the territory proposed to be annexed equal to at least five percent of the registered voters in that territory as of the most recent general election for state and county officers.

(b) Before the governing board of the junior college district may order an annexation election, the board must hold a public hearing within the territory proposed for annexation. The hearing must be held not earlier than the 45th day and not later than the 30th day before the date the board issues the order for the election.

(c) Not later than the 30th day before the date of a public hearing held under Subsection (b), the board shall complete and publish a service plan for the territory proposed for annexation. The service plan is informational only and must include:

(1) the maximum property tax rate that the board may adopt;

(2) the most recent property tax rate adopted by the board and any tax rate increase proposed or anticipated to occur after the annexation;

(3) the tuition rate that would apply after annexation for a student who resides in the district;

(4) the tuition and fees that would apply under Section 130.0032(d) for a student who resides outside the district;

(5) plans for providing educational services in the territory, including proposed or contemplated campus and facility expansion in the territory;

(6) plans for cooperation with local workforce agencies; and

(7) any other elements consistent with this subchapter prescribed by rule of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(d) The governing board shall issue an order for an election to be held in the territory proposed for annexation on a uniform election date that is not less than 45 days after the date of the order and that affords enough time to hold the election in the manner provided by law. The board shall give notice of the election in the manner provided by law for notice by the county judge of a general election.

(e) The governing board shall conduct the election in accordance with the Election Code.

(f) The election shall be held only in the territory proposed for annexation, and only those registered voters residing in that territory are permitted to vote.

(g) The ballot shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "Approving the annexation by the _________ (name of junior college district) of the following territory: __________ (with the blank filled in with a description of the territory proposed for annexation), and authorizing the imposition of an ad valorem tax for junior college purposes, which is currently set at a rate of ____________ (with the blank filled in with the ad valorem tax rate of the district for the current year or, if that rate has not been adopted, the tax rate for the preceding year) per $100 valuation of taxable property."

(h) The measure is adopted if the measure receives a favorable vote of a majority of those voters voting on the measure.

(i) If the measure is adopted, the governing board of the district shall enter an order declaring the result of the election and that the territory is annexed to the junior college district on the date specified in the order.

(j) If the proposition is adopted and the governing board is elected from single-member districts, the governing board in the annexation order entered under Subsection (i) shall assign the new territory to one or more of the current single-member districts.

(k) The annexation of territory and any resulting change in the single-member districts from which members of the governing board are elected does not affect the term of a member of the governing board serving on the date the annexation or redistricting takes effect. The governing board shall provide that each member of the governing board representing a single-member district who is holding office on the date the annexation takes effect serve the remainder of the member's term and represent a single-member district in the expanded junior college district for that term regardless of whether the member resides in that single-member district.

(l) If the measure is not adopted at the election, another election to annex all or part of the same territory may not be held earlier than one year after the date of the election at which the measure is not adopted.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3002, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.065 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3290, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 89, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1100 (H.B. 2221), Sec. 5, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 37 (S.B. 1226), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 130.066. AUTOMATIC ANNEXATION OF CERTAIN TERRITORY. If the junior college district annexes territory under this subchapter comprising all of a municipality or school district, the governing board by order may annex for junior college purposes any territory later annexed by or added to the municipality or school district.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3291, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1397, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1100 (H.B. 2221), Sec. 5, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 130.067. ANNEXATION OF COUNTY-LINE SCHOOL DISTRICT FOR JUNIOR COLLEGE PURPOSES. (a) In this section:

(1) "County-line school district" means any type of public school district created or organized under general or special law that includes within its boundaries territory that is located in two or more counties of Texas.

(2) "County or joint-county junior college district" means a junior college district that was originally created and organized with the same boundaries as a county or as a group of contiguous counties and that included all of the territory in the county or group of counties and did not include a part of any county without including the entire territory of the county.

(b) A part of a county-line school district that is contiguous to but not included within the boundaries of a county or joint-county junior college district may be annexed to the junior college district for junior college purposes only either by election as provided by Section 130.065 or by order entered pursuant to a petition requesting annexation of the territory as provided by this section.

(c) The county or joint-county junior college district as originally created and organized must have included in its boundaries a part of the county-line school district, and the part of the county-line school district to be annexed may not be included in any other junior college district.

(d) On presentation of a petition, signed by a number of registered voters residing in the part of a county-line school district requesting annexation equal to at least a majority of the registered voters residing in that territory as of the most recent general election for state and county officers to the county judge of the county in which the territory requested to be annexed is located, together with a certified copy of an order by the governing board of the junior college district approving the proposed annexation to the junior college district for junior college purposes only, the county judge shall certify the filing of the petition and order to the commissioners court. The court at its next meeting shall pass an order declaring the territory annexed to the junior college district.

(e) Territory may be annexed by petition under this section only if the territory is located wholly within a single county. For territory located in more than one county, a separate petition requesting the annexation of the territory is required for each county.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3003, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.066 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3292, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1100 (H.B. 2221), Sec. 5, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 130.068. EXTENDING BOUNDARIES OF JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT IN DISTRICT'S SERVICE AREA. (a) The governing board of a junior college district may order an election on the question of establishing expanded boundaries for the junior college district to encompass all of the territory located within the district's service area established by Subchapter J, other than territory located in the service area of another junior college district, if more than 35 percent of the total number of students who enrolled in the junior college district in the most recent academic year resided outside of the existing junior college district.

(b) The governing board of a junior college district may order an election on the question of establishing expanded boundaries for the junior college district to encompass part of the territory located within the district's service area established by Subchapter J, other than territory located in the service area of another junior college district, if more than 15 percent of the high school graduates for each of the preceding five academic years in the territory proposed to be added to the district have enrolled in the junior college district.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by this section, Section 130.065 applies to an action taken under this section, including the provisions of Section 130.065 requiring a petition to be submitted before an election may be called.

(d) A junior college district may not adopt new boundaries for the district under this section that extend within the service area of another junior college district.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3004, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.067 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3292, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1100 (H.B. 2221), Sec. 6, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 130.069. DISANNEXATION OF OVERLAPPED TERRITORY. (a) All junior college districts whose boundaries have or may hereafter become established so that they include territory which prior to such establishment lay, and shall continue to lie, within the boundaries of another junior college district shall have the power to disannex such overlapped territory.

(b) Upon certification by the governing board of such a junior college district to the county board of school trustees of the county in which its college is located that such an overlapping condition exists, the county board may by resolution disannex the overlapped territory from the district, describing such territory by metes and bounds.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3003, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.068 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3293, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.070. DISANNEXATION OF TERRITORY COMPRISING AN INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT. (a) The territory of an independent school district which is the only school district that has been annexed to a countywide independent school district junior college district in an adjoining county may be disannexed from such countywide independent school district junior college district and constituted as a separate independent school district junior college district in accordance with the provisions of this section, provided that the countywide independent school district junior college district has no outstanding bonded indebtedness which was incurred after the annexation of such independent school district.

(b) The proposed disannexation and creation of a separate junior college district shall be initiated by a petition signed by not less than five percent (5%) of the registered voters of the independent school district seeking disannexation. The petition shall be presented to the board of trustees of the independent school district seeking to be disannexed, which shall pass upon the legality and genuineness of the petition and forward the petition, if approved, to the coordinating board.

(c) If the petition is found to be in order and all statutory provisions have been complied with, the coordinating board shall approve the petition and notify the board of trustees of the independent school district seeking to be disannexed, of such approval. The board of trustees of the independent school district seeking disannexation shall then order an election to be held in the school district within a time not less than twenty (20) days nor more than thirty (30) days after the order is issued. At the election the ballots shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "Disannexation of the ______________ Independent School from the ______________ Junior College District, and creation of the ______________ Junior College District with boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of the ______________ Independent School District" (the blanks to be filled in as appropriate). All expenses incurred in holding the election shall be paid by the independent school district ordering such election.

(d) The board of trustees shall make a canvass of the returns and declare the result of the election within ten (10) days after holding the election and shall enter an order on the minutes of the board as to the result of the election. If a majority of the votes cast are in favor of disannexation and creation of a separate junior college district, such independent school district shall be deemed disannexed and constituted as a separate junior college district.

(e) If the creation of the separate junior college district is approved, it shall be governed by the provisions of this code relating to independent school district junior colleges. The offices of the representatives of the disannexed independent school district on the governing body of the countywide independent school district junior college district shall be terminated, and the remaining members of that governing body shall continue to serve for the terms for which they were elected.

(f) Any petition for disannexation and creation of a separate junior college district may also incorporate a request for the proper authorities, in the event an election is ordered for the creation of a new district, to submit at the same election, either as a part of the disannexation issue or as a separate issue, the questions of issuing bonds and levying bond taxes and levying maintenance taxes, in the event the district is created, not to exceed the limits provided in Section 130.122 of this code.

Added by Acts 1972, 62nd Leg., 4th C.S., p. 37, ch. 16, Sec. 1, eff. Oct. 30, 1972. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 90, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER E. BOARDS OF TRUSTEES OF JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICTS

Sec. 130.081. GOVERNING BOARD OF JUNIOR COLLEGE OF INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT. In each junior college district which is controlled and managed by, and under the jurisdiction of, the governing board of an independent school district or a city school district, such governing board shall be constituted and chosen in accordance with the laws of this state applicable to the governing board of such independent school district or city school district.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3004, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.071 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3293, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.082. GOVERNING BOARD OF JUNIOR COLLEGE OF OTHER THAN INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT. (a) Except as provided by Section 130.081 or another section of this subchapter, the governing boards of all junior college districts shall be constituted and chosen as described in the provisions of this section.

(b) The official name of the governing board of the junior college district shall be the board of trustees.

(c) The official name of a junior college district shall be the "__________ Junior College District" unless the board of trustees of the district elects to call the district a community college district, in which event the official name of the junior college district shall be the "________ Community College District." The board shall designate an appropriate and locally pertinent descriptive word or words to be filled in the appropriate blank (and may change such designation when deemed advisable) by resolution or order; provided that no two districts shall have the same or substantially similar names. A district may change its name under Section 130.005 or 130.0051. All resolutions or orders designating or changing names shall be filed immediately with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board and the first name filed shall have priority, and the district shall be advised of any previous filing of any identical or substantially similar name. The name of any junior college district existing on September 1, 1997, shall remain the same until and unless it is changed under this chapter, and any change in the name of a junior college district made before that date is validated and is deemed to have been properly made. Another district may not use the name of any district whose name change is validated under this subsection.

(d) The number of members or trustees of the governing board shall be either seven or nine, in accordance with the laws applicable to the junior college district on the effective date of this code or on the date of the creation of a new district or a new board. Any seven-member board may be increased to nine, and the two additional members shall be appointed by resolution or order of the board for terms of office as prescribed in Subsection (e) of this section. Any vacancy occurring on the board through death, resignation, or otherwise, shall be filled by a special election ordered by the board or by appointment by resolution or order of the board. A person appointed to fill a vacancy in a trustee district must be a resident of that trustee district. A person appointed to fill a vacancy in the representation of the district at large must be a resident of the district at large. A special election to fill a board vacancy is conducted in the same manner as the district's general election except as provided by the applicable provisions of the Election Code. The person appointed to fill the unexpired term shall serve until the next regular election of members to the board, at which time the position shall be filled by election for a term appropriately shortened to conform with what regularly would have been the length of the term for that position. Each member of the board shall be a resident, qualified voter of the district and shall take the proper oath of office before taking up the duties thereof. Members of a board shall not receive any remuneration or emolument of office, but they shall be entitled to reimbursement for their actual expenses incurred in performing their duties, to the extent authorized and permitted by the board. The board shall elect one of its members as president of the board, and the president shall preside at meetings of said board and perform such other duties and functions as are prescribed by the board. The president of the board shall have a vote the same as the other members. The board shall elect a secretary of the board who may or may not be a member of the board, and who shall be the official custodian of the minutes, books, records, and seal of said board, and who shall perform such other duties and functions as are prescribed by the board. The board shall be authorized to elect any other officers as deemed necessary or advisable. Officers of the board shall be elected at the first regular meeting of the board following the regular election of members of the board in even-numbered years, or at any time thereafter in order to fill a vacancy. Said board shall be authorized to appoint or employ such agents, employees, and officials as deemed necessary or advisable to carry out any power, duty, or function of said board; and to employ a president, dean, or other administrative officer, and upon the president's recommendation to employ faculty and other employees of the junior college. Said board shall act and proceed by and through resolutions or orders adopted or passed by the board and the affirmative vote of a majority of all members of the board shall be required to adopt or pass a resolution or order, and the board shall adopt such rules, regulations, and bylaws as it deems advisable, not inconsistent with this section.

(e) The basic term of office of a member of the board shall be six years, and one-third of the members of the board shall be elected at large in the district at regular elections to be held on the first Saturday in April in each even-numbered year; provided that with a seven-member board two members shall be elected in two consecutive even-numbered years and three members shall be elected in the following even-numbered year. The members of each board in office at the effective date of this act, and all subsequent members of the board, shall remain in office until the expiration of the terms for which they were elected or appointed, and until their successors shall have been elected and qualified; provided that where any existing board has held its regular elections for members of the board in odd-numbered years prior to the effective date of this act, the board shall nevertheless hold its next regular election on the first Saturday in April of the next even-numbered year following the effective date of this act, and the term of office of each incumbent member of the board shall, in effect, be lengthened by one year so as to comply with the foregoing provisions of this act. Upon the creation of a new board, or in any other situation where necessary, the members of the board shall choose by lot the terms for which they shall serve, so as to comply with the foregoing provisions. If a board is increased from seven to nine members, one of the members shall be appointed to serve until the first election at which two members otherwise would have been elected, and the other shall be appointed to serve until the second election at which two members otherwise would have been elected, and three members shall be elected for six-year terms at each election.

(f) Members of a board shall be elected at large from each junior college district at regular elections to be called and held by the board for such purpose, at the expense of the district, on the first Saturday in April in each even-numbered year. Said elections shall be held in accordance with the Texas Election Code except as hereinafter provided, and all resident, qualified electors of the district shall be permitted to vote. Each such election shall be called by resolution or order of the board, and notice of each such election shall be given by publishing an appropriate notice, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, at least 10 days prior to the date of the election, setting forth the date of the election, the polling place or places, the numbers of the positions to be filled, the candidates for each position and any other matters deemed necessary or advisable.

(g) The board shall designate a number for the position held by each member of the board, from one upward in consecutive numerical order in such manner that the lowest numbers shall be assigned to the members whose terms of office expire in the shortest length of time, provided that any such position number designations on existing boards under existing law at the effective date of this act shall remain in effect. At each election candidates shall be voted upon and be elected separately for each position on the board, and the name of each candidate shall be placed on the official ballot according to the number of the position for which he or she is running. A candidate receiving a majority of the votes cast for all candidates for a position shall be declared elected. If no candidate receives such a majority, then the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall run against each other for the position. The run-off election for all positions shall be held on a date that complies with law and shall be ordered, notice thereof given, and held, as provided herein for regular elections. Any resident, qualified elector of the district may have his or her name placed as a candidate on the official ballot for any position to be filled at each regular election by filing with the secretary of the board a written application therefor signed by the applicant, not later than 5 p.m. of the 45th day before the date of the election. An application may not be filed earlier than the 30th day before the date of the filing deadline. Such application must state the number of the position for which he or she is a candidate, or the name of the incumbent member of the board holding the position for which he or she desires to run. The location on the ballot of the names of candidates for each position shall be chosen by lot by the board. A candidate shall be eligible to run for only one position at each election.

(h) Notwithstanding anything in this code to the contrary, the provisions of all or any part of the laws of this state in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this act and relating to the name of any junior college district or the name of its governing board, or to the number of members of its governing board, or the procedures and times of electing or choosing said members, shall remain in effect under the following conditions. If, at any time before the effective date of this act (but not thereafter), the governing board of any junior college district shall specify by resolution or order the particular provisions of the aforesaid laws applicable to it which it desires to remain in effect, then such particular provisions shall continue to apply to said board and its district; provided that at any time thereafter the governing board may make this section in its entirety applicable to it and its district by appropriate resolution or order, and thereby permanently cancel the effect of the aforesaid particular provisions of other laws. All resolutions and orders permitted by this section shall be filed immediately with the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System.

(i) The election of trustees of a countywide junior or community college district that contains a city with a population of more than 1.18 million located primarily in a county with a population of 2.5 million or more shall be held on the first Saturday in April of each even-numbered year. When a runoff election is necessary, the board may order the election for a date to coincide with the date of the runoff election for city officials, if the city is holding a runoff election; otherwise, the board shall set the date of the runoff election for not later than three weeks following the regular election.

(j) Notwithstanding the election dates prescribed by this section, an election held under this section shall be held on a uniform election date as provided by law.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3004, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.072 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3294, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 2035, ch. 673, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1975; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1386, ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1977; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 4806, ch. 844, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 29, 1983; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 25(j), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 508, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 2, Sec. 1, eff. July 18, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 63, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 570, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.0821. GOVERNING BOARD OF CERTAIN COUNTYWIDE COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICTS. (a) The members of the governing board of a countywide community college district that contains a city with a population of more than 384,500 residents shall be elected from single-member trustee districts.

(b) The board of trustees shall divide the district into the appropriate number of compact trustee districts which contain as nearly as practicable an equal number of inhabitants according to the last preceding federal census. Residents of each trustee district shall be entitled to elect one member of the board, and each candidate seeking to represent a trustee district must reside in the trustee district he seeks to represent. Trustees shall, during their term of office, reside within the trustee district from which they were elected.

(c) Members of the board of trustees of the district shall serve for staggered terms of six years with the terms of one-third of the members, as nearly as may be, expiring in each even-numbered year.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

(e) Not later than the 90th day after the earliest date on which the board of trustees may recognize and act on the publication of the federal decennial census under Section 2058.001, Government Code, the board of trustees shall redivide the district into the appropriate number of trustee districts if the census data indicates that the population of the most populous trustee district exceeds the population of the least populous district by more than 10 percent. Within 90 days following the effective date of an order or resolution of the board of trustees to increase the number of board members, the board of trustees shall redivide the district into the appropriate number of trustee districts as increased. At the next district election following the redistricting of the district under this subsection, each trustee district shall elect a member of the board unless the board of trustees determines that trustees shall be elected from the new trustee districts as provided by Section 130.0826, and the members elected shall draw lots for the appropriate number of two-year, four-year, and six-year terms as needed to establish staggered terms as required by Subsection (c).

(f) Any election held pursuant to the terms of this section shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Subsection (i), Section 130.082 of this code.

(g) Trustees elected under the provisions of this section take office on the first Tuesday in May.

(h) A district described by Subsection (a) of this section that has previously adopted or been required to implement single-member district representation in connection with a judicial proceeding may continue to operate under that plan.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1868, ch. 743, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 89, Sec. 1, eff. May 11, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1324, Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2001.

Sec. 130.0822. ELECTION FROM SINGLE-MEMBER TRUSTEE DISTRICTS. (a) The board of trustees of a junior college district may order that all or a majority of the trustees of the district be elected from single-member trustee districts.

(b) An order of the board adopted under Subsection (a) of this section must be entered not later than the 120th day before the day of the first election of trustees from single-member trustee districts.

(c) The appointment and election of trustees of the junior college district are subject to Section 130.082 of this code, except as otherwise provided by this section.

(d) If the board orders that trustees shall be elected from single-member trustee districts, the board shall divide the junior college district into the appropriate number of trustee districts, based on the number of members of the board that are to be elected from single-member districts, and shall number each trustee district.

(e) The trustee districts must be compact and contiguous, and must be as nearly as practicable of equal population according to the last preceding federal census.

(f) Trustee districts must be drawn not later than the 90th day before the day of the first election of trustees from single-member districts.

(g) The board may provide for trustees holding office on the date of the initial election of trustees from single-member districts to serve the remainder of their terms and to represent a trustee district for that term without having residency in that trustee district.

(h) Except in the case of residents of a trustee district who are represented by a trustee serving in accordance with Subsection (g) of this section, residents of each trustee district are entitled to elect one trustee to the board. A candidate for trustee must be a resident of the trustee district the candidate seeks to represent. A trustee other than a trustee serving in accordance with Subsection (g) of this section vacates the office if he or she ceases to reside in the trustee district he or she represents.

(i) Any vacancy on the board shall be filled by appointment made by the remaining members of the board. The appointed person serves for the unexpired term.

(j) After each redistricting, all positions on the board shall be filled unless the board of trustees determines that trustees shall be elected from the new trustee districts as provided by Section 130.0826. The trustees then elected shall draw lots for staggered terms as provided by Section 130.082.

(k) Not later than the 90th day before the day of the first regular junior college district trustee election at which trustees may officially recognize and act on the last preceding federal census, the board shall redivide the district into the appropriate number of trustee districts if the census data indicates that the population of the most populous district exceeds the population of the least populous district by more than 10 percent. Redivision of the district shall be in the manner provided for the initial division of the district.

(l) This section does not apply to a junior college district to which Section 130.081, 130.083, 130.0821, or 130.088 of this code applies, or to a junior college district required by other law to elect trustees from single-member districts. This section does not apply to the election of trustees in any district in which the election of trustees is governed by a court order so long as that order remains in effect. This section does apply to an independent school district junior college district governed by a separate board of trustees.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1029, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 89, Sec. 2, eff. May 11, 2001.

Sec. 130.0823. ELECTION BY POSITION IN CERTAIN DISTRICTS. (a) This section applies to a junior college that elects a governing board of seven members, with four members elected from respective commissioner precincts and three members elected at large.

(b) The governing board of the junior college may order that the board members elected at large be elected instead by position. The order must be entered not later than the 120th day before the first election of a trustee by position.

(c) The board may provide for trustees holding office on the date of the initial election of trustees by position to serve the remainder of their terms and to represent a position for that term.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1070, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Sec. 130.0824. GOVERNING BOARD OF TEXARKANA COLLEGE DISTRICT. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the governing board of the Texarkana College District may by resolution or order of the board decrease the number of board members from nine to seven, with four members elected from respective commissioner precincts and three members elected at large.

(b) A resolution or order of the governing board under this section must establish transition terms of office to conform to elections held in even-numbered years and staggered six-year terms, with the initial board terms of three members expiring in 2014, of two members expiring in 2016, and of two members expiring in 2018.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 825 (S.B. 1855), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 130.0825. WRITE-IN VOTING IN ELECTION FOR MEMBERS OF GOVERNING BODY. (a) In a general or special election for members of the governing body of a junior college district, a write-in vote may not be counted for a person unless the person has filed a declaration of write-in candidacy with the secretary of the board of trustees in the manner provided for write-in candidates in the general election for state and county officers.

(b) A declaration of write-in candidacy must be filed not later than the deadline prescribed by Section 146.054, Election Code, for a write-in candidate in a city election.

(c) Subchapter B, Chapter 146, Election Code, applies to write-in voting in an election for members of the governing body except to the extent of a conflict with this section.

(d) The secretary of state shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318, Sec. 51(2), eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1343, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 666, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 925, Sec. 10, eff. Nov. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1109 (H.B. 2339), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 45, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 51(2), eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 130.0826. OPTION TO CONTINUE IN OFFICE FOLLOWING REDISTRICTING. (a) The board of trustees of any junior college district that elects some or all of its members from single-member districts and in which the trustees serve staggered terms may provide for the trustees in office at the first election after the junior college district is redistricted to serve for the remainder of their terms in accordance with this section.

(b) If the board of trustees provides for the trustees in office to serve for the remainder of their terms in accordance with this section, the trustee districts established by the redistricting plan shall be filled as the staggered terms of trustees in office expire. When the board of trustees adopts a redistricting plan, the board shall determine from which new trustee district the position of each trustee in office will be filled as it becomes vacant.

(c) This section does not authorize a trustee of a junior college district to continue in office after a redistricting plan takes effect if the member no longer resides in the district from which the trustee was elected.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 89, Sec. 3, eff. May 11, 2001.

For contingent expiration of this section, see Subsection (e).

Sec. 130.0828. ADDITIONAL TRUSTEES FOR WEATHERFORD JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, in addition to the members of the board of trustees of the Weatherford Junior College District elected or appointed under other provisions of this subchapter, the commissioners court of each county in which a branch campus of the district is located and that imposed a branch campus maintenance tax under Section 130.253 on September 1, 2017, shall appoint one member to serve on the district's board of trustees.

(b) Members of the board of trustees appointed under this section serve two-year terms and may be appointed to serve successive terms. The commissioners court shall appoint initial members to serve a term beginning December 1, 2017.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), a member of the board of trustees appointed under this section may participate in the decision-making of the board to the same extent as any other member of the board, including by voting on any budget that affects the entire district.

(d) A member of the board of trustees appointed under this section:

(1) may not participate in the decision-making of the board in matters related to:

(A) the imposition of a tax; or

(B) an issue that only affects a campus located in the junior college district;

(2) is not counted for purposes of determining whether a quorum of the board is present for the purpose of Subdivision (1); and

(3) may not serve as an officer of the board of trustees.

(e) Unless this section is continued in effect by the legislature, this section expires on December 1, 2027.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 58 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 130.08285. GOVERNING BOARD OF TRINITY VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the governing board of the Trinity Valley Community College District may by resolution or order of the governing board increase the number of board members to 11.

(b) A resolution or order of the governing board under this section must:

(1) establish transition terms of office to conform to elections held in even-numbered years and staggered six-year terms; and

(2) require the initial board members to draw lots to determine the members' terms, with:

(A) five members serving terms of two years;

(B) three members serving terms of four years; and

(C) three members serving terms of six years.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 181 (S.B. 286), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 130.0828 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(8), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 130.0829. GOVERNING BOARD OF PARIS JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the governing board of the Paris Junior College District may provide by resolution or order of the board for the election of nine board members as follows:

(1) eight members elected from respective commissioner precincts and evenly allocated among those precincts; and

(2) one member elected at large.

(b) A resolution or order of the governing board under Subsection (a) must establish transition terms of office to conform to elections held in even-numbered years and staggered six-year terms.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 41.0052, Election Code, the governing board of the Paris Junior College District by resolution or order of the board may change the date on which the district holds its general election for board members to the November uniform election date. The governing board shall adjust the terms of office to conform to a change made to the election date under this subsection.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1112 (H.B. 4276), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 130.083. GOVERNING BOARD IN ENLARGED JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT. (a) From and after May 22, 1969, those junior college districts which were on May 22, 1969, operating under Chapter 15, Acts of the 58th Legislature, 1963 (Article 2815o-1b, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes), and to which one, or more, school districts has been annexed for junior college purposes only, may, by a majority vote of the board of regents of the junior college district, choose to operate and be governed by a board of regents.

(b) Each school district which has been annexed to the junior college district for junior colleges purposes only shall be represented by at least one member of the board of regents. If the assessed tax rolls exceed $67,500,000, the school district shall be represented by one member of the board of regents for each $67,500,000 of assessed value, or a major fraction thereof, on the junior college tax roll, located within the school district. The original junior college district shall be represented on the board of regents by a number of regents arrived at according to the same formula.

(c) The total number of members of the board of regents of the junior college district shall never exceed 14. When the valuation of the enlarged district increases to the point that the number of regents exceeds 14 under the formula described in Subsection (b) of this section then the board of regents of the junior college district shall set a formula, based on proportional tax values, of representation, which will produce a total of 14 members of the board of regents.

(d) The terms of office of the regents authorized by this act shall be six years. Those regents serving as regents on May 22, 1969, shall continue in office for the remainder of their respective terms and then until such time as their successors shall have been elected and qualified, and thereafter in each even-numbered year three regents shall be elected from the area originally forming the junior college district to succeed those regents whose terms are expiring, but if the number of regents becomes more or less than nine, the formula set out in Subsection (e) of this section shall be followed. All new regents added to the board of regents under the provisions of this section shall be appointed by the board of regents which orders the enlargement of the membership of such board, and shall serve until election specified in Subsection (e) of this section. All vacancies on the board of regents shall be filled at once for the unexpired term only by appointments made by the remaining members of such board.

(e) Where additional regent positions are provided under the terms of this section, the board of regents at the time of such authorization shall designate by resolution duly recorded in the minutes of such board the term to be served by each such additional regent, provided that the first regent authorized and appointed shall serve only until the next regular regent election, the second such regent shall serve until the regent election two years after the next regular regent election, and the third regent shall serve until the regent election four years after the next regular regent election, with additional regents which may be authorized to follow the same rotation of terms until all terms of additional regents provided under the terms of this section have been fixed to expire at the next regular regent election, or at the regent election two years after the next regular regent election, or at the regent election four years after the next regular election. Additional regents appointed to such terms and until such times as their successors shall have been elected and qualified, and thereafter the terms of such regents shall be for six years.

(f) Regent elections in all parts of the districts affected by the provisions of this section shall be held at the times and in the manner now provided for public junior colleges by general law. The qualified voters residing in the school district represented shall be entitled to vote in such elections. Each regent to be elected shall be a resident of the school district he is to represent and each regent to represent the original college district shall be a resident of the original college district.

(g) The provisions of this section shall be cumulative of existing laws governing elections of regents in public junior college districts.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3296, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.084. POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The governing board of a junior college district shall be governed in the establishment, management, and control of a public junior college in the district by the general law governing the establishment, management, and control of independent school districts insofar as the general law is applicable.

(b) The governing board of a junior college district may set and collect with respect to a public junior college in the district any amount of tuition, rentals, rates, charges, or fees the board considers necessary for the efficient operation of the college, except that a tuition rate set under this subsection must satisfy the requirements of Section 54.051(n). The governing board may set a different tuition rate for each program, course, or course level offered by the college, including a program, course, or course level to which a provision of Section 54.051 applies, as the governing board considers appropriate to reflect course costs or to promote efficiency or another rational purpose.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3007, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.073 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3298, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 805 (S.B. 532), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 130.0845. REMOVAL OF TRUSTEE FOR NONATTENDANCE OF BOARD MEETINGS. (a) It is a ground for removal of a member of the board of trustees of a junior college district that the member is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled board meetings that the member is eligible to attend during a calendar year, not counting an absence for which the member is excused by a majority vote of the board.

(b) The validity of an action of the board of trustees is not affected by the fact that the action is taken when a ground for removal of a member of the board exists.

(c) A member of a board of trustees may be removed for a ground provided by this section, using the procedures provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 87, Local Government Code, for removing a county official.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 673 (S.B. 114), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 130.085. TUITION EXEMPTION. (a) The board of trustees of any public junior college may exempt from payment of tuition all students who are residents of the junior college district and who are enrolled for 12 or more semester credit hours, provided that this action will allow the college to participate in and benefit from funds available as provided by Sections 1-7, Title I, 64 Stat. 1100, as amended, 20 U.S.C. Secs. 236-241-1.

(b) This action by the board of trustees does not affect their authority under Section 130.123, nor does this section in any way supersede that section. This action of the board does not affect the right of the college to an allocation of state appropriations under this chapter and Chapter 130A.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3355, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 40, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.0851. TUITION EXEMPTION FOR DISTRICT EMPLOYEES. The governing board of a junior college district may exempt a district employee who enrolls in courses offered by the district from the payment of all or part of the tuition or fees charged to a student at a junior college by the district.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 382 (H.B. 1568), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 130.088. BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF CERTAIN JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICTS. (a) If an independent school district board that has control and management of a junior college district that contains all or part of a city with a population of more than 1,500,000 divests itself of control and management under Section 130.016 or 130.017 of this code, the appointment and election of trustees of the junior college district are subject to Sections 130.018 and 130.082 of this code, except as otherwise provided by this section.

(b) The board of trustees consists of nine members elected from trustee districts.

(c) If the board of trustees of the independent school district that divests itself of management and control of the junior college district is elected from nine single-member districts, the trustees appointed for the junior college district shall have the same initial single-member district boundaries. For the initial board members of the junior college district appointed by the independent school district board of trustees, three members shall serve terms of two years, three members shall serve terms of four years, and three members shall serve terms of six years. The trustees shall draw lots to determine the length of their terms. The terms of the initial board members shall expire on the last day of December of the odd-numbered year that does not exceed their terms.

(d) Each trustee district must be compact and contiguous and of a population to the extent practicable equal to other trustee districts.

(e) The general election for trustees shall be held every two years on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the odd-numbered year or on the uniform election date chosen by the prior board under prior law.

(f) The board of trustees of the independent school district shall designate a number for each trustee district. At each election candidates are voted on and elected separately for each trustee district, and a candidate's name is placed on the official ballot according to the number of the district for which the candidate is running.

(g) The voters of each trustee district elect one trustee.

(h) If a trustee changes residence to a location outside the district from which the trustee is elected, the trustee vacates the office. Except as provided by Subsection (i) of this section, a district boundary change that results in the trustee who represents the district no longer being a resident of the district does not affect the trustee's term. That trustee serves for the remainder of the term to which elected. If the trustee changes residence to a location that is neither in the district as it existed on the date the trustee was elected to the current term nor in the new district, the trustee's seat on the board is vacated.

(i) If a change in district boundaries occurs as a result of redistricting and places the residence of a trustee whose office is not next up for election outside the numbered district for which the trustee was elected and the trustee fails to move his residence within the new boundaries of that numbered district before the 75th day preceding the date of the first election for which the boundary changes are effective, the office is vacated and shall be filled at that election.

(j) If new territory is added to the district, the board shall temporarily assign the territory to one or more trustee districts as appropriate. Not later than the 180th day after the publication of a federal census, the board shall revise district boundaries to take account of district population changes.

(k) To be entitled to a place on the ballot, a candidate for trustee must file an application for a place on the ballot with the board secretary not later than 5 p.m. of the 45th day before election day. An application may not be filed earlier than the 30th day before the date of the filing deadline.

(l) To be elected, a trustee candidate must receive a majority of the total number of votes received by all the candidates for the position. If no candidate receives the vote required for election to a position, the board shall order a runoff election to be held in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Election Code.

(m) Trustees serve for six-year staggered terms. The terms of three members expire on the last day of December of each odd-numbered year.

(n) The board shall fill by appointment a board vacancy. The remaining members of the board, not later than the 30th day after the date on which the vacancy occurs, shall select a suitable person who resides in the applicable district to fill the board vacancy until the next regular trustee election. If the board for any reason fails or refuses to appoint a person to fill the board vacancy, the board shall order an election for the purpose of filling the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term. The election shall be held on the next uniform election date provided by the Election Code as long as that date does not occur before the 90th day after the date on which the vacancy occurs.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 556, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 130.089. PROHIBITED EMPLOYMENT OF OR CONTRACTING WITH FORMER TRUSTEE. A public junior college may not employ or contract with an individual who was a member of the board of trustees of the junior college before the first anniversary of the date the individual ceased to be a member of the board of trustees.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 56, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 130.090. REMEDIAL PROGRAMS FOR SECONDARY SCHOOL STUDENTS. (a) The governing board of a junior college district may contract with the governing board of an independent school district in the junior college district's service area for the junior college to provide remedial programs for students enrolled in secondary schools in the independent school district in preparation for graduation from secondary school and entrance into college.

(a-1) The governing board of a junior college district located wholly or partly in a county with a population of more than three million may contract to provide remedial programs under Subsection (a) with the governing board of any independent school district located wholly or partly in a county with a population of more than three million.

(b) The governing board of a junior college district may exempt from tuition a student enrolled in a remedial program provided under Subsection (a).

(c) The grant of an exemption from tuition under Subsection (b) does not affect the right of a junior college to an allocation of state appropriations under this chapter and Chapter 130A attributable to the contact hours of the junior college with the student receiving the exemption.

(d) For instances when state funding is provided to both a school district and a public junior college for a student enrolled in courses offered by a junior college under Subsection (a), the commissioner of education and the commissioner of higher education shall jointly develop a mechanism to identify and eliminate duplication of state funding.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 196, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1177 (S.B. 1004), Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 41, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER F. SPECIAL PROGRAMS OPERATED BY CERTAIN JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICTS

Sec. 130.091. DEFINITION. In this chapter "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (H.B. 2074), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 130.092. EAST WILLIAMSON COUNTY MULTI-INSTITUTION TEACHING CENTER. (a) The Temple Junior College District may establish, in conjunction with at least one of the following institutions, the East Williamson County Multi-Institution Teaching Center:

(1) Tarleton State University;

(2) Tarleton State University System Center--Central Texas;

(3) Texas State Technical College--Waco; or

(4) another public or private institution of higher education.

(b) The center shall provide coordinated higher education opportunities to the residents of the region in which the center is located by offering academic credit courses and programs from the member institutions of the center. The center must be administered under a formal agreement entered into by the Temple Junior College District with the other member institutions.

(c) The member institutions of the center shall work with the local community to identify and offer courses that will meet the educational and workforce development goals for the region served by the center.

(d) The member institutions of the center may, under the terms of the formal agreement, make provisions for adequate physical facilities for use by the center.

(e) The member institutions of the center may solicit, accept, and administer, on terms and conditions acceptable to the members, gifts, grants, or donations of any kind and from any source for use by the center.

(f) A member institution of the center, a political subdivision, an entity created by a political subdivision, or a nonprofit corporation may individually or jointly, under the terms of an agreement under Subsection (d), finance or refinance the acquisition, purchase, construction, improvement, renovation, enlargement, or equipping of physical facilities described by Subsection (d) through the issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations. The financing of facilities under this subsection may be made through a long-term agreement with another member institution, political subdivision, or other entity described by this subsection, or through a guarantee of any bond, note, or other obligation. Any bond, note, or other obligation issued or a long-term agreement or guarantee made under this subsection may not exceed a term of 40 years.

(g) Any bond, note, or other obligation issued or long-term agreement or guarantee made under Subsection (f) may be pledged as security for and used towards the payment of any bond, note, or other obligation issued for the benefit of the center. A bond, note, or other obligation issued or long-term agreement or guarantee made under Subsection (f) is not subject to annual appropriation.

(h) The financing of facilities under this section promotes the public purpose of supporting higher education and further promotes the public purpose of developing and diversifying the economy of this state and eliminating unemployment and underemployment in this state under the authority granted by Section 52-a, Article III, Texas Constitution.

(i) A member institution of the center, political subdivision, entity created by a political subdivision, or nonprofit corporation may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds, notes, or other obligations issued or a long-term agreement or guarantee made under Subsection (f), and to the extent permitted by law, all or any part of the available revenues, taxes, or any combination of revenues and taxes of the member institution, political subdivision, entity, or nonprofit corporation. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while any bonds, notes, or obligations for which the pledge is made, or bonds, notes, or other obligations issued to refund those bonds, notes, or obligations, are outstanding.

(j) An agreement providing for bonds, notes, or other obligations, or a long-term agreement or guarantee, under Subsection (f) may provide for a member institution, political subdivision, entity created by a political subdivision, or nonprofit corporation to have an ownership or other interest in the facilities to be financed by the bonds, notes, or obligations, or long-term agreements or guarantees, or to participate in the operation of the facility.

(k) A member institution of the center, political subdivision, entity created by a political subdivision, or nonprofit corporation may use an entity created under Chapter 53 or 53A to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(l) This section is wholly sufficient authority for the execution of agreements, the pledge of revenues, taxes, or any combination of revenues and taxes, and the performance of other acts and procedures authorized by this section without reference to any other provision of law or any restriction or limitation contained in those provisions, except as specifically provided by this section. To the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other law, this section shall prevail and control. A member institution of the center, political subdivision, entity created by a political subdivision, or nonprofit corporation may use any law not in conflict with this section to the extent convenient or necessary to carry out any power or authority, expressed or implied, granted by this section.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (H.B. 2074), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 703 (H.B. 2805), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 130.093. REGIONAL CENTER FOR PUBLIC SAFETY EXCELLENCE. (a) In this section:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement ("TCOLE").

(2) "Regional center" means the regional center for public safety excellence established under this section.

(b) The regional center for public safety excellence is established to develop and provide education and training for law enforcement personnel in the Rio Grande Valley, including:

(1) education and training leading toward an associate of applied science degree or certificate or another public safety or law enforcement-related associate degree or certificate;

(2) TCOLE officer certification; and

(3) a continuing education certification.

(c) South Texas College shall administer the regional center in partnership with political subdivisions and participating school districts in the Rio Grande Valley. The headquarters of the regional center are located at South Texas College in Pharr, Texas. The regional center may use property and facilities at other locations in Hidalgo and Starr Counties.

(d) In developing its training programs and courses, the regional center shall ensure that the program or course curriculum satisfies any requirements imposed by the commission under Subchapter F, Chapter 1701, Occupations Code, for the regional center to operate as a commission-approved training provider under that chapter.

(e) The regional center may solicit and accept gifts and grants from any public or private source for purposes of this section. The legislature may appropriate money for purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 751 (H.B. 1887), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER G. FISCAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 130.121. TAX ASSESSMENT AND COLLECTION. (a) The governing board of each junior college district, and each regional college district, for and on behalf of its junior college division, annually shall cause the taxable property in its district to be assessed for ad valorem taxation and the ad valorem taxes in the district to be collected, in accordance with any one of the methods set forth in this section, and any method adopted shall remain in effect until changed by the board.

(b) Each governing board shall be authorized to have the taxable property in its district assessed and/or its taxes collected, in whole or in part, by the tax assessors and/or tax collectors, respectively, of any county, city, taxing district, or other governmental subdivision in which all or any part of the junior college district is located.

(c) The governing board of a joint county junior college district shall be authorized to have the taxable property in its district assessed or its taxes collected, in whole or in part, by the tax assessors or tax collectors, respectively, of any county, city, taxing district, or other governmental subdivision in which all or any part of the joint county junior college district is located. The tax assessors or tax collectors of a governmental subdivision, on the request of the governing board of a joint county junior college district, shall assess and collect the taxes of the joint county junior college district in the manner prescribed in the Property Tax Code. Tax assessors and tax collectors shall receive compensation in an amount agreed on between the appropriate parties, but not to exceed two percent of the ad valorem taxes assessed.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3016, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.101 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3307, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 563, ch. 198, Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 1977; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2317, ch. 841, Sec. 4(k), eff. Jan. 1, 1982.

Sec. 130.122. TAX BONDS AND MAINTENANCE TAX. (a) The governing board of each junior college district, and each regional college district for and on behalf of its junior college division, shall be authorized to issue negotiable coupon bonds for the construction and equipment of school buildings and the purchase of the necessary sites therefor, and levy and pledge annual ad valorem taxes sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on said bonds as the same come due, and to levy annual ad valorem taxes for the further maintenance of its public junior college or junior colleges; provided that the annual bond tax shall never exceed 50 cents on the $100 valuation of taxable property in the district, and the annual bond tax, if any, together with the annual maintenance tax shall never exceed the aggregate of $1 on the $100 valuation of taxable property in the district. Such bonds may be issued in various series or issues, and shall mature serially or otherwise not more than 40 years from their date, and shall bear interest at such rate or rates as shall be determined within the discretion of the board. Said bonds, and the interest coupons appertaining thereto, shall be negotiable instruments, and they may be made redeemable prior to maturity, and may be issued in such form, denominations, and manner, and under such terms, conditions, and details, and shall be signed and executed, as provided by the board in the resolution or order authorizing the issuance of said bonds. All bonds shall be sold to the highest bidder for not less than their par value and accrued interest.

(b) No such bonds shall be issued and none of the aforesaid taxes shall be levied unless authorized by a majority of the electors voting at an election held for such purpose in accordance with law, at the expense of the district. Each such election shall be called by resolution or order of the board, which shall set forth the date of the election, the proposition or propositions to be submitted and voted on, the polling place or places, and any other matters deemed necessary or advisable by the board. Notice of said election shall be given by publishing a substantial copy of the election resolution or order one time, at least 10 days prior to the date set for the election, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The board shall canvass the returns and declare the results of such election.

(c) The governing board of each junior college district, and each regional college district, shall be authorized to refund or refinance all or any part of any of its outstanding bonds and matured but unpaid interest coupons payable from ad valorem taxes by the issuance of negotiable coupon refunding bonds payable from ad valorem taxes. Said refunding bonds shall mature serially or otherwise not more than 40 years from their date, and shall bear interest at such rate or rates as shall be determined within the discretion of the board. Said refunding bonds may be issued without an election in connection therewith, provided that in no event shall any series or issue of refunding bonds be issued in a principal amount greater than the face or par value of the obligations being refunded thereby, and provided that if a maximum interest rate was voted for the bonds being refunded, the refunding bonds shall not bear interest at a rate higher than such voted maximum rate. Said refunding bonds, and the interest coupons appurtenant thereto, shall be negotiable instruments and they may be made redeemable prior to maturity, and may be issued in such form, denomination, and manner, and under such terms, conditions, and details, and shall be signed and executed, as provided by the board in the resolution or order authorizing the issuance of said refunding bonds. The refunding bonds shall be issued and delivered in lieu of, and upon surrender to the Comptroller of Public Accounts of the State of Texas and cancellation of, the obligations being refunded thereby, and the comptroller of public accounts shall register the refunding bonds and deliver the same in accordance with the provisions of the resolution or order authorizing the refunding bonds. Such refunding may be accomplished in one or in several installment deliveries. Said refunding bonds also may be issued and delivered in accordance with the provisions of and procedures authorized by any other applicable law.

(d) All bonds issued pursuant to this section, and the appropriate proceedings authorizing their issuance, shall be submitted to the attorney general of the State of Texas for examination. If he finds that such bonds have been authorized in accordance with law he shall approve them, and thereupon they shall be registered by the Comptroller of Public Accounts of the State of Texas; and after such approval and registration such bonds shall be incontestable in any court, or other forum, for any reason, and shall be valid and binding obligations in accordance with their terms for all purposes.

(e) All bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be legal and authorized investments for all banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, small business investment corporations, insurance companies of all kinds and types, fiduciaries, trustees, and guardians, and for all interest and sinking funds and other public funds of the State of Texas and all agencies, subdivisions, and instrumentalities thereof, including all counties, cities, towns, villages, school districts, and all other kinds and types of districts, public agencies, and bodies politic. Said bonds also shall be eligible and lawful security for all deposits of public funds of the State of Texas and all agencies, subdivisions, and instrumentalities thereof, including all counties, cities, towns, villages, school districts, and all other kinds and types of districts, public agencies, and bodies politic, to the extent of the market value of said bonds, when accompanied by any unmatured interest coupons appurtenant thereto.

(f) Each junior college district, and each regional college district (with reference to the operation and maintenance of its junior college division) heretofore or hereafter created pursuant to the laws of this state, is hereby declared to be, and constituted as, a school district within the meaning of Article VII, Section 3, of the Texas Constitution.

(g) All tax bonds voted in any district in accordance with law but unissued at the effective date of this code may be issued in the manner provided in this section, without an additional election; and all maintenance taxes heretofore voted in any district in accordance with law may be levied and collected in the manner provided in this act, without an additional election.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3017, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.102 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3308, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.1221. CREDIT AGREEMENTS IN CERTAIN JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICTS. (a) This section applies only to a junior college district that, at the time of the issuance of obligations and execution of credit agreements under this section, has:

(1) at least 2,000 full-time students or the equivalent; or

(2) a combined aggregate principal amount of at least $50 million of outstanding bonds and voted but unissued bonds.

(b) A district to which this section applies may, in the issuance of bonds as provided by Section 130.122, exercise the powers granted to the governing body of an issuer with regard to the issuance of obligations and execution of credit agreements under Chapter 1371, Government Code.

(c) A proposition to issue bonds to which this section applies must include the question of whether the governing board may levy, pledge, assess, and collect annual ad valorem taxes sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds and the costs of any credit agreements executed in connection with the bonds.

(d) A district may not issue bonds to which this section applies in an amount greater than the greater of:

(1) 25 percent of the sum of:

(A) the aggregate principal amount of all district debt payable from ad valorem taxes that is outstanding at the time the bonds are issued; and

(B) the aggregate principal amount of all bonds payable from ad valorem taxes that have been authorized but not issued;

(2) $25 million, in a district that has at least 3,500 but not more than 15,000 full-time students or the equivalent; or

(3) $50 million, in a district that has more than 15,000 full-time students or the equivalent.

(e) Sections 1371.057 and 1371.059, Government Code, govern approval by the attorney general of obligations issued under the authority of this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1536, Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.224, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 130.123. REVENUE BONDS. (a) The governing board (hereinafter called the "board") of each junior college district and each regional college district shall be authorized and have the power to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, equip, operate, and/or maintain any property, buildings, structures, activities, operations, or facilities, of any nature, for and on behalf of its institution or institutions.

(b) For the purpose of carrying out any one or more of the aforesaid powers each board shall be authorized to issue its revenue bonds to be payable from and secured by liens on and pledges of all or any part of any of the revenues from any rentals, rates, charges, fees, or other resources of such board, in the manner hereinafter provided. Said bonds may be issued to mature serially or otherwise not more than 50 years from their date. In the authorization of any such bonds, each board may provide for the subsequent issuance of additional parity bonds, or subordinate lien bonds, or other types of bonds, under such terms or conditions as may be set forth in the resolution or order authorizing the issuance of said bonds, all within the discretion of the board. Said bonds, and any interest coupons appertaining thereto, shall be negotiable instruments (provided that such bonds may be issued registrable as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest), and shall be executed, and may be made redeemable prior to maturity, and may be issued in such form, denominations, and manner, and under such terms, conditions, and details, and may be sold in such manner, at such price, and under such terms, and said bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates, as shall be determined and provided by the board in the resolution or order, authorizing the issuance of said bonds. If so permitted in the bond resolution, and required part of the proceeds from the sale of the bonds may be used for paying interest thereon during the period of the construction of any facilities to be provided through the issuance of said bonds, and for the payment of operation and maintenance expenses of said facilities to the extent, and for the period of time, specified in said bond resolution, and also for the creation of reserves for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds; and such moneys be invested, until needed, to the extent, and in the manner provided, in said bond resolution or order.

(c) Each board shall be authorized to fix and collect rentals, rates, charges, and/or fees, including student union fees, from students and others for the occupancy, use and/or availability of all or any of its property, buildings, structures, activities, operations, or facilities, of any nature, in such amounts and in such manner as may be determined by such board.

(d) Each board shall be authorized to pledge all or any part of any of its revenues from any of the aforesaid rentals, rates, charges, and/or fees to the payment of any bonds issued hereunder, including the payment of principal, interest, and any other amounts required or permitted in connection with said bonds. When any of the revenues from any such rentals, rates, charges, and/or fees are pledged to the payment of bonds, they shall be fixed and collected in such amounts as will be at least sufficient, together with any other pledged resources, to provide for all payments of principal, interest, and any other amounts required in connection with said bonds, and, to the extent required by the resolution or order authorizing the issuance of said bonds, to provide for the payment of operation, maintenance, and other expenses. Each board shall be authorized to establish and enforce such parietal rules for students and others, and to enter into such agreements regarding occupancy, use, and availability, and the amounts and collection of pledged revenues, fees, or other resources as will assure making all said required payments. Fees for the use or availability of all or any property, buildings, structures, activities, operations, or facilities, of any nature, may be pledged to the payment of said bonds, and shall be fixed and collected from all or any designated part of the students enrolled in the institution or institutions, in such amounts and in such manner as shall be determined and provided by the board in the resolution or order authorizing the issuance of the bonds, and said fees may be collected in the full amounts required or permitted herein, without regard to actual use or availability, commencing at any time designated by the board. Said fees may be fixed and collected for the use or availability of any specifically described property, buildings, structures, activities, operations, or facilities, of any nature; or said fees may be fixed and collected as general fees for the general use or availability of the institution or institutions. Such specific and/or general fees may be fixed and collected and pledged to the payment of any issue or series of bonds issued hereunder, in the full amounts required or permitted herein, in addition to, and regardless of the existence of, any other specific or general fees at the institution or institutions; provided that each board may restrict its power to pledge such additional specific or general fees in any manner that may be provided in the resolution or order authorizing the issuance of any bonds issued hereunder, and provided that no such additional specific fees shall be pledged if prohibited by any resolution or order which authorized the issuance of any then outstanding bonds issued pursuant to any Texas statute.

(e) In addition to the revenues, fees, and other resources authorized to be pledged to the payment of bonds issued hereunder, each board further shall be authorized to pledge irrevocably to such payment, out of the tuition charges required or permitted by law to be imposed at its institution or institutions, an amount not exceeding 25 percent of the tuition charges collected from each enrolled student for each semester or term, and each board also shall be authorized to pledge to such payment all or any part of any grant, donation, or income received or to be received from the United States government or any other public or private source, whether pursuant to an agreement or otherwise.

(f) Any revenue bonds issued by any such board under this act, and any revenue bonds or notes issued by any such board under any other Texas statute and payable from tuition fees and charges and/or any part of the use fees from or revenues of any property, buildings, structures, activities, operations, or facilities at the institution or institutions, may be refunded or otherwise refinanced by such governing board, and in such case all pertinent and appropriate provisions of this section shall be fully applicable to such refunding bonds. In refunding or otherwise refinancing any such bonds or notes the governing board may, in the same authorizing proceedings, refund or refinance bonds issued pursuant to this section and bonds or notes issued pursuant to any other such Texas statute and combine all said refunding bonds and any other additional new bonds to be issued pursuant to this section into one or more issues or series of bonds, and may provide for the subsequent issuance of additional parity bonds, or subordinate lien bonds, or other type of bonds. All refunding bonds shall be issued and delivered under such terms and conditions as may be set forth in the authorizing proceedings.

(g) All bonds permitted to be issued under this section, and the appropriate proceedings authorizing their issuance, shall be submitted to the Attorney General of the State of Texas for examination. If he finds that such bonds have been authorized in accordance with law he shall approve them, and thereupon they shall be registered by the Comptroller of Public Accounts of the State of Texas; and after such approval and registration such bonds shall be incontestable in any court, or other forum, for any reason, and shall be valid and binding obligations in accordance with their terms for all purposes.

(h) All bonds issued under this section shall be legal and authorized investments for all banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, small business investment corporations, insurance companies of all kinds and types, fiduciaries, trustees, and guardians, and for all interest and sinking funds and other public funds of the State of Texas and all agencies, subdivisions, and instrumentalities thereof, including all counties, cities, towns, villages, school districts, and all other kinds and types of districts, public agencies, and bodies politic. Said bonds also shall be eligible and lawful security for all deposits of public funds of the State of Texas and all agencies, subdivisions, and instrumentalities thereof, including all counties, cities, towns, villages, school districts, and all other kinds and types of districts, public agencies, and bodies politic, to the extent of the market value of said bonds, when accompanied by any unmatured interest coupons appurtenant thereto.

(i) All revenue bonds heretofore approved by the Attorney General of the State of Texas and registered by the Comptroller of Public Accounts of the State of Texas which were issued, sold, and delivered by any board, and which are payable from or secured by a pledge of any revenues, use fees, tuition, or other resources of such board, are hereby validated in all respects, together with all proceedings authorizing the issuance thereof, and said bonds and proceedings shall be valid as though they had been duly and legally issued and authorized originally.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3019, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.103 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3310, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 113, Sec. 2, eff. May 17, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1070, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 130.124. USE OF STUDENT FEES IN CONSTRUCTION. (a) A junior college district facility constructed with student fees may be used only for junior college purposes.

(b) Student fees may not be used for construction, repair, or rehabilitation of a community center or junior college district auxiliary enterprise unless the enterprise serves as a student center or dormitory.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1696, ch. 319, Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 1983.

Sec. 130.125. REVENUE OBLIGATIONS. (a) As used in this section:

(1) "Credit agreement" means a loan agreement, revolving credit agreement, agreement establishing a line of credit, letter of credit, reimbursement agreement, insurance contract, commitment to purchase obligations, purchase or sale agreement, or commitment or other contract or agreement authorized and approved by the governing body of the issuer in connection with the authorization, issuance, security, exchange, payment, purchase, or redemption of obligations or interest thereon.

(2) "Eligible project" means any project or purpose for which an issuer is authorized to issue revenue bonds pursuant to Section 130.123 of this code or any other provision of law.

(3) "Governing body" means the governing board of an issuer.

(4) "Issuer" means a junior college district or a regional college district.

(5) "Obligations" means notes, warrants, or other special obligations authorized to be issued by an issuer under the provisions of this section and all "public securities" as defined by Section 1201.002, Government Code, which prior to the delivery thereof, have been rated by a nationally recognized rating agency for municipal securities in either one of the three highest ranking categories for short-term obligations or one of the four highest ranking categories for long-term obligations. It is provided, however, that the term "obligations" does not mean or include any obligations payable from ad valorem taxes.

(6) "Project costs" means all costs and expenses incurred in relation to an eligible project, including without limitation design, planning, engineering, and legal costs, acquisition costs of land, interest in land, rights-of-way, and easements, construction costs, costs of machinery, equipment, and other capital assets incident and related to the operation, maintenance, and administration of an eligible project, and financing costs, including interest during construction and thereafter, underwriter's discount and fees for legal, financial, and other professional services. Project costs attributable to an eligible project and incurred prior to the issuance of any obligations issued to finance an eligible project may be reimbursed from the proceeds of sale of obligations.

(b) The governing body of an issuer is hereby authorized and empowered to issue, sell, and deliver obligations and execute credit agreements in order to finance project costs of an eligible project or to refund obligations issued in connection with an eligible project, subject to the limitations contained herein. Obligations shall be secured solely by: (1) the proceeds of sale of other obligations; (2) any revenues which the issuer is authorized by any statute or constitutional provision to pledge to the payment of any obligations; or (3) any one or more of such sources, including credit agreements, all as the governing body of the issuer shall provide in the resolution or order authorizing the issuance of the obligations. Obligations shall be repaid from the source or sources securing the payment thereof, funds received from a credit agreement, or from any other revenues otherwise legally available for the payment thereof, except funds derived from ad valorem taxation.

(c) The issuance of obligations shall be authorized by resolution or order of the governing body of an issuer, which resolution or order shall fix the maximum amount of obligations to be issued or, if applicable, the maximum principal amount which may be outstanding at any time, the maximum term obligations issued and delivered pursuant to such authorization shall be outstanding, the maximum interest rate to be borne by the obligations (within the limitations of Chapter 1204, Government Code), the manner of sale (which may be by either public or private sale), price, form, terms, conditions, and covenants thereof. The resolution or order authorizing the issuance of obligations may provide for the designation of a paying agent and registrar for the obligations and may authorize one or more designated officers or employers of the issuer to act on behalf of the issuer from time to time in the selling and delivering of obligations authorized and fixing the dates, price, interest rates, interest payment periods, and other procedures as may be specified in the resolution or order. Obligations may be issued in such form or such denomination, payable at such time or times, in such amount or amounts or installments, at such place or places, in such form, under such terms, conditions, and details, in such manner, redeemable prior to maturity at any time or times, bearing no interest, or bearing interest at any rate or rates (either fixed, variable, floating, adjustable, or otherwise, all as determined in accordance with the resolution or order providing for the issuance of the obligations, which resolution or order may provide a formula, index, contract, or any other arrangement for the periodic determination of interest rates), not to exceed the maximum net effective interest rate allowed by law and may be signed or otherwise executed in such manner, with manual or facsimile signatures, and with or without a seal, all as shall be specified by the governing body of the issuer in the resolution or order authorizing the issuance of the obligations. The proceeds received from the sale of obligations may be deposited or invested in any manner and in such obligations as may be specified in the resolution or order or other proceedings authorizing the obligations. In the event any officer or officers whose signatures are on any obligations cease to be such officer or officers before the delivery thereof to the purchaser, such signature or signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and the successor or successors in office of any such officers shall be fully authorized to complete the execution, authentication, or delivery of said obligations to the purchaser or purchasers thereof.

(d) The governing body of an issuer may enter into credit agreements in conjunction with the issuance, payment, sale, resale, or exchange of obligations to enhance the security for or provide for the payment, redemption, or remarketing of the obligations and interest on the obligations or to reduce the interest payable on the obligations. A credit agreement is an agreement for professional services and shall contain the terms and conditions and be for the period that the governing body of the issuer approves. The cost to the issuer of the credit agreement may be paid from the proceeds of the sale of the obligations to which the credit agreement relates or from any other source, including revenues of the issuer that are available for the purpose of paying the obligations and the interest on the obligations or that may otherwise be legally available to make those payments.

(e) Obligations, including accrued interest, may from time to time be refinanced, renewed, or refunded by the issuance of other obligations. Credit agreements entered into by an issuer, whether pursuant to the provisions of this section or not, may be refinanced, renewed, refunded, or otherwise terminated and a new credit agreement substituted therefor by amendment to the proceedings which authorized such credit agreements and, if required to accomplish the substitution of credit agreements, outstanding bonds may be refunded with obligations.

(f) Preliminary to the issuance and delivery of obligations, the resolution or order authorizing the issuance thereof, together with any credit agreements and any contracts providing revenues and security to pay the obligations, shall be submitted to the attorney general for his review. If the attorney general shall find that such credit agreement or agreements, if any, contracts, if any, and other authorizing proceedings conform to the requirements of the Texas Constitution and this section, the attorney general shall approve them. Thereafter, the authorized obligations may be executed and delivered, exchanged, or refinanced from time to time in accordance with the authorizing proceedings. Upon such approval by the attorney general and initial delivery of any obligations so authorized, any such credit agreements, any such contracts providing revenues or security, such initial obligations, and all other obligations thereafter issued pursuant to the authorizing proceedings shall be incontestable for any cause in any court or other forum and shall be valid and binding obligations enforceable in accordance with their respective terms and provisions.

(f-1) The governing body of an "eligible issuer" may enter into credit agreements as described in Subsection (d). As used in this subsection, "eligible issuer" means an issuer that prior to the effective date of this subsection (i) issued bonds which, prior to or simultaneously with the delivery thereof, were rated by a nationally recognized rating agency for municipal securities in one of the four highest ranking categories for long-term obligations, and (ii) reserved in the resolution or order authorizing issuance of the bonds the right, in the event of a change in state law, to substitute a credit agreement in lieu of cash and investments in a reserve fund established pursuant to the resolution or order.

(g) All obligations issued by an issuer shall constitute negotiable instruments and are investment securities governed by Chapter 8, Business & Commerce Code, notwithstanding any provisions of law or court decision to the contrary and are legal and authorized investments for banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, fiduciaries, and trustees and for the sinking funds of cities, towns, villages, school districts, and other political subdivisions or public agencies of the State of Texas. Said obligations also are eligible to secure deposits of any public funds of the state or any political subdivision or public agency of the state and are lawful and sufficient security for the deposits to the extent of their market value.

(h) This section shall be construed liberally to effectuate the legislative intent and purposes of this section and all powers herein granted shall be broadly interpreted to effectuate such intent and purposes and not as a limitation of powers.

(i) In case any one or more of the provisions, clauses, or words of this section or the application of such provisions, clauses, or words to any situation or circumstance shall for any reason be held to be invalid or unconstitutional, such invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect any other provisions, clauses, or words of this section or the application of such provisions, clauses, or words to any other situation or circumstance, and it is intended that this section shall be severable and shall be construed and applied as if any such invalid or unconstitutional provision, clause, or word had not been included herein.

(j) This section shall be cumulative of all other laws on the subject, but this section shall be wholly sufficient authority within itself for the issuance of obligations and the performance of the other acts and procedures authorized hereby, or under any agreement, without reference to any other laws or any restrictions or limitations contained herein. To the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between any provisions of this section and any provisions of any other law, the provisions of this section shall prevail and control; provided, however, that any issuer shall have the right to use the provisions of any other laws not in conflict with the provisions hereof to the extent convenient or necessary to carry out any power or authority, express or implied, granted by this section.

(k) When the governing body of any issuer provides in the resolution or order or other proceedings authorizing the issuance of any bond, any credit agreement, or any other agreement for a pledge or lien on revenues, income, or other resources of the issuer, or the assets of the issuer, or any fund maintained by the issuer to secure payment of the obligations or to secure payments required by a credit agreement or any other agreement, such pledge or lien shall be valid and binding in accordance with its terms without further action on the part of the issuer and without any filing or recording with respect thereto except in the records of the issuer. All such liens and pledges shall be perfected from the time of payment for and delivery of the obligations and the credit agreement or other agreement until the obligations or other payments, including those under the credit agreement, have been paid or payment of the obligations has been provided for or the terms of the credit agreement or other agreement have been satisfied in accordance with their respective terms and such lien shall be fully perfected as to items then on hand and thereafter received until the satisfaction of such obligations, and said items shall be subject to such liens or pledges without any physical delivery thereof or further act. Nothing contained in this section shall relieve any issuer of any obligation to file or record any lien on realty or submit any issue of obligations for approval by the attorney general and registration by the comptroller of public accounts.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1075, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 490, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.225, 8.226, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 130.126. LONG-TERM NOTES. (a) The governing board of a public junior college district or regional college district located in one or more counties having a total population of at least 100,000 according to the last preceding federal census may issue notes to pay expenses of asbestos cleanup and removal in the district.

(b) Notes issued under this section must be secured by a designated portion of the issuer's revenues, which may include ad valorem maintenance taxes, and must mature not later than the first day of the 15th year after the date on which the notes are issued.

(c) A note issued under this section is debt under Section 26.012, Tax Code.

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (b) of this section, the governing board of a public junior college district or regional college district must issue the notes in the manner provided by Chapter 1201, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 15.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.227, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 130.127. REFUNDING NOTES. The governing board of a public junior college district or regional college district may issue refunding notes to refund notes issued under Section 130.126 of this code in the manner and for the purposes provided by Subchapter A, Chapter 1207, Government Code, to make a deposit under Subchapter B or C of that chapter.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 15.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.228, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 130.128. SALE OF NOTES. (a) The governing board of a public junior college district or regional college district may sell notes or refunding notes issued under this subchapter at a public or private sale and at a price that the board determines is adequate.

(b) The governing board of a public junior college district or regional college district shall deposit proceeds from the sale of notes issued under this subchapter in the district's general revenue fund.

(c) Proceeds from the sale of notes issued under this subchapter may be used to pay the costs of issuing, marketing, or distributing the notes.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 15.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991.

Sec. 130.129. INTEREST RATE. Notes and refunding notes issued under this subchapter must bear interest at a rate not to exceed the rate provided by Chapter 1204, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 15.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.228, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 130.130. NOTES ARE NOT TAX BONDS. Notes and refunding notes issued under this subchapter are not tax bonds under Section 130.122 of this code, and an election is not required before the governing board of a public junior college district or regional college district may issue such notes or refunding notes.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 15.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER H. TRANSFER OF ASSETS ON DISSOLUTION OF DISTRICTS

Sec. 130.131. DISSOLUTION AND TRANSFER OF PROPERTY UPON CREATION OF SENIOR COLLEGE. (a) Whenever the legislature shall create within the boundary of any union junior college district a state-supported senior college of the first rank offering at least four years of college work, and whenever such union junior college district has been dissolved in the manner provided for in Sections 19.361-19.364 of this code, which said method of dissolution of such district is hereby authorized, the trustees of such union junior college district shall transfer the corporeal properties and facilities of such union junior college district to such state-supported senior college, and such trustees, after such dissolution and transfer of properties of such district, shall not further maintain a junior college and shall function only for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section and shall have no authority to create any additional indebtedness against such district, and when the bonded indebtedness of such district has been fully paid, such union junior college district shall cease to exist; provided that in the order calling such election and in the notice thereof, the authorities calling such election shall designate the date when such district shall be dissolved and such transfer shall be made, which date shall be within two years from the date of the election, and on or prior to said date.

(b) When any union junior college district has been dissolved and its properties transferred as provided in Subsection (a) of this section, or in any other lawful manner, having at the time of such dissolution outstanding bonds or other indebtedness enforceable either at law or in equity, then the county commissioners court, for the purpose of paying such bonds, or other indebtedness, shall have power and be authorized to annually levy and collect ad valorem taxes sufficient only to pay the interest and create a sinking fund to retire the bonded indebtedness of such district, and the expense of collecting such taxes and paying such bonded indebtedness, and for no other purpose; provided such tax shall not exceed the rate voted by such district for junior college purposes; said county commissioners court shall have power to bring and defend litigation in the name of said union junior college district.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3022, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.201 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3313, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.132. ABOLITION OF JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICTS. (a) The term "applicable district," as used in this section, shall mean any junior college district which has conveyed all, or substantially all, of its property and assets to a state-supported senior college or university located in such junior college district, and which junior college district has no outstanding bonded indebtedness.

(b) All applicable districts and their governing boards are hereby abolished and shall cease to exist and function; provided, however, that all delinquent and uncollected taxes in said applicable districts shall not hereby be discharged, but shall be and remain fully due, payable and collectible. The persons formerly acting as the governing board and officers of each applicable district shall turn over all remaining property and assets of said applicable district, including all tax collections on hand, directly to the state-supported senior college or university located therein. The governing board of the independent school district in which any such state-supported senior college or university is located shall, for and on behalf of any such applicable district, cause, through its tax collector and other officers, all delinquent and uncollected taxes of any such applicable district to be collected in accordance with the general laws applicable to independent school districts. All of said taxes, as collected, shall be turned over to any such state-supported senior college or university. All taxes turned over to any such state-supported senior college or university in accordance with this section may be used by it for any lawful purpose.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3022, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.202 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3313, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 130.133. TRANSFER OF PROPERTIES OF COUNTY JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICTS AFTER CREATION OF SENIOR COLLEGE. (a) Whenever the legislature has created or shall create within the boundaries of any county junior college district a state-supported senior college offering at least four years college work upon the condition that the board of trustees of said county junior college district shall convey all of the assets, real, personal, tangible, and intangible held in its name as of the date fixed for the establishment of said senior college and containing the other provision that said properties shall be conveyed to the governing body of the senior college free and clear of any indebtedness or indebtednesses, encumbrance or encumbrances of any kind or character and of whatsoever nature, the board of trustees of said county junior college district is hereby fully authorized and empowered to convey to the governing body of the senior college all of such assets, real, personal, tangible, and intangible held by it on the date fixed for such conveyance in the act creating such senior college, except moneys on hand for the payment of outstanding obligations of the district.

(b) From and after the conveyance of the properties of said county junior college district to the governing body of said senior college, the county junior college district shall not further maintain a junior college and shall function only for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section.

(c) Where such county junior college district had or has outstanding tax obligations in the nature of bonds or other indebtedness, the board of trustees of said county junior college district shall continue to make the necessary tax levies annually for the purpose of paying necessary administrative expenses of the board of trustees and paying off and discharging such bonded or other indebtedness, both principal and interest, until all of the same has been fully paid off and discharged.

(d) Where said county junior college district has outstanding any bonds payable from the revenues from any building or buildings which revenue bonds constitute an encumbrance upon the income of such building or buildings, the board of trustees of the county junior college district is hereby authorized to issue bonds of said county junior college district payable from ad valorem taxes of said district and to sell such tax-supported bonds and pay off such revenue bonds or to exchange such tax-supported bonds for said revenue bonds. No such tax-supported bonds shall be issued, however, until authorized at an election held for that purpose and at which election a majority voting thereon shall have voted in favor of the issuance of said bonds.

(e) The board of trustees of the county junior college district is hereby authorized to perform all acts necessary toward the final discharge of all the indebtedness of said county junior college district and to perform all necessary administrative acts in connection therewith. Said board of trustees is specifically authorized to continue to levy and collect sufficient taxes annually within the limits prescribed by law and authorized by the required election for the purpose of discharging the principal and interest on all outstanding bonded and other indebtedness, including the repayment of any temporary loans which said board may find necessary to obtain in order to pay all current operating expenses of the junior college up to the date of the conveyance of the properties until all such obligations have been fully discharged, and such temporary loans are hereby authorized, and such temporary loans heretofore obtained are hereby ratified and validated.

Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 3023, ch. 889, Sec. 1. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.203 by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3314, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER I. EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITIES FOR DISADVANTAGED STUDENTS

Sec. 130.151. PURPOSE. It is the purpose of this subchapter to enable each junior college which fulfills the provisions of this subchapter to provide useful and meaningful educational programs for any person 17 years of age or older with a high school diploma or its equivalent, or for any person 18 years of age regardless of prior educational experience, cultural background, or economic resources.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 570, ch. 243, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1973.

SUBCHAPTER J. JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREAS

Sec. 130.161. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Services" means the courses and programs described by Sections 130.0011 and 130.003(e).

(2) "Service area" means:

(A) the territory within the boundaries of the taxing district of a junior college district; and

(B) the territory outside the boundaries of the taxing district of a junior college district in which the junior college district provides services.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.162. ALAMO COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Alamo Community College District includes the territory within:

(1) Bexar, Bandera, Comal, Kendall, Kerr, and Wilson counties;

(2) Atascosa County, except the territory within the Pleasanton Independent School District; and

(3) Guadalupe County, except the territory within the San Marcos Consolidated Independent School District.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 350 (S.B. 1193), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 130.163. ALVIN COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Alvin Community College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Alvin, Danbury, and Pearland independent school districts; and

(2) the part of the Angleton Independent School District annexed by the community college district before September 1, 1995.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.164. AMARILLO COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Amarillo College District includes the territory within Potter, Randall, Carson, Oldham, Deaf Smith, Parmer, Castro, Swisher, and Moore counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 672 (H.B. 1374), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 130.165. ANGELINA COUNTY JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Angelina County Junior College District includes the territory within:

(1) Angelina, Houston, Nacogdoches, Polk, Sabine, San Augustine, Trinity, and Tyler counties;

(2) the Wells and Alto independent school districts, located in Cherokee County;

(3) the Burkeville and Newton independent school districts, located in Newton County;

(4) the Jasper Independent School District, located in Jasper County;

(5) the Shepard and Coldspring-Oakhurst Consolidated independent school districts located in San Jacinto County;

(6) the part of the Brookeland Independent School District that is located in Jasper and Newton counties;

(7) the part of the Colmesneil Independent School District that is located in Jasper County; and

(8) the part of the Trinity Independent School District that is located in Walker County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.166. AUSTIN COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Austin Community College District includes the territory within:

(1) Hays, Caldwell, and Blanco counties;

(2) Travis County, except the territory within the Marble Falls Independent School District;

(3) Williamson County, except the territory within the Florence, Granger, Hutto, Lexington, Taylor, and Thrall independent school districts;

(4) the part of the San Marcos Consolidated Independent School District located in Guadalupe County;

(5) Bastrop County, except the territory within the Lexington Independent School District;

(6) the part of the Elgin Independent School District located in Lee County; and

(7) the part of the Smithville Independent School District located in Fayette County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 523, Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 572, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1400, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 350 (S.B. 1193), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 753 (H.B. 3236), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 601 (S.B. 495), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 130.167. BEE COUNTY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Bee County College District includes the territory within:

(1) Bee, Karnes, Live Oak, Jim Wells, McMullen, Duval, and Brooks counties;

(2) the Pleasanton Independent School District, located in Atascosa County; and

(3) the Kingsville, Santa Gertrudis, and Ricardo independent school districts, located in Kleberg County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.168. BLINN JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Blinn College District includes the territory within:

(1) Washington, Burleson, Brazos, Madison, Grimes, and Waller Counties;

(2) the Mumford, Hearne, and Franklin Independent School Districts located in Robertson County;

(3) Austin County, other than the territory within the Wallis-Orchard Independent School District;

(4) the Milano and Gause Independent School Districts located in Milam County;

(5) the part of the Richards Independent School District that is located in Walker and Montgomery Counties;

(6) the part of the Bryan Independent School District that is located in Robertson County;

(7) Fayette County, other than the territory within the Smithville Independent School District;

(8) Lee County, other than the territory within the Elgin Independent School District;

(9) the part of the Lexington Independent School District that is located in Bastrop, Milam, and Williamson Counties; and

(10) the part of the Waller Independent School District that is located in Harris County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 173, Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1195 (H.B. 381), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 753 (H.B. 3236), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 367 (H.B. 1114), Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 2023.

Sec. 130.169. BORGER JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Borger Junior College District includes:

(1) the territory within the Borger Independent School District;

(2) the territory within the Spring Creek Independent School District that is also within the junior college district's taxing district; and

(3) the territory within Dallam, Sherman, Hansford, Ochiltree, Lipscomb, Hartley, Hutchinson, Roberts, and Hemphill counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 4, Sec. 1, eff. April 17, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 672 (H.B. 1374), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 130.170. BRAZOSPORT COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Brazosport College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Brazosport, Columbia-Brazoria, Sweeny, and Damon independent school districts; and

(2) the Angleton Independent School District, except the part annexed by the Alvin Community College District before September 1, 1995.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.171. CENTRAL TEXAS COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Central Texas College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Killeen Independent School District, located in Bell County;

(2) the Copperas Cove Independent School District, located in Coryell County;

(3) Fort Hood and North Fort Hood, located in Bell County;

(4) Coryell, Gillespie, Hamilton, Lampasas, Llano, Mason, Mills, and San Saba counties;

(5) the Brady, Lohn, and Rochelle independent school districts located in McCullough County;

(6) the Burnet Consolidated Independent School District located in Burnet County;

(7) the Florence Independent School District;

(8) the part of the Lampasas Independent School District that is located in Burnet County;

(9) the part of the Lampasas Independent School District that is located in Bell County;

(10) the part of the Copperas Cove Independent School District that is located in Bell County; and

(11) the Marble Falls Independent School District.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1400, Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 601 (S.B. 495), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 130.172. CISCO JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Cisco Junior College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Cisco Independent School District; and

(2) Callahan, Coleman, and Taylor counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.173. CLARENDON COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Clarendon College District includes the territory within Gray, Donley, Wheeler, Armstrong, Collingsworth, Briscoe, Hall, and Childress counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 4, Sec. 1, eff. April 17, 1997.

Sec. 130.174. COLLEGE OF THE MAINLAND DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the College of the Mainland District includes the territory within:

(1) the Santa Fe, Hitchcock, Texas City, La Marque, Dickinson, and Friendswood independent school districts; and

(2) the part of the Clear Creek Independent School District that is located in Galveston County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.175. COLLIN COUNTY COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Collin County Community College District includes the territory within:

(1) Collin and Rockwall counties; and

(2) the part of Denton County that is within the municipality of The Colony, the municipality of Frisco, and the Celina and Prosper independent school districts.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.176. DALLAS COUNTY COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Dallas County Community College District includes the territory within:

(1) Dallas County; and

(2) the Carrollton-Farmers Branch Independent School District.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.177. DEL MAR COLLEGE-CORPUS CHRISTI JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Del Mar College-Corpus Christi Junior College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Corpus Christi, West Oso, Calallen, Tuloso-Midway, and Flour Bluff independent school districts, and any area located outside of those school districts that is within the municipality of Corpus Christi;

(2) Nueces, San Patricio, Aransas, and Kenedy counties; and

(3) the Riviera Independent School District.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.178. EL PASO COUNTY COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the El Paso County Community College District includes the territory within El Paso and Hudspeth counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.179. GALVESTON COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Galveston College District includes:

(1) the territory within the Galveston Independent School District;

(2) the part of Galveston and Chambers counties located on the Bolivar Peninsula, including the municipality of High Island and the High Island Independent School District; and

(3) the territory within the Sabine Pass and Hamshire-Fannett independent school districts in Jefferson County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.180. GRAYSON COUNTY JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Grayson County Junior College District includes the territory within:

(1) Grayson County; and

(2) the Bonham, Dodd City, Wolfe City, Ector, Leonard, Savoy, Trenton, Whitewright, and Sam Rayburn independent school districts located in Fannin County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.181. HILL COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Hill College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Hillsboro, Itasca, Covington, Whitney, Abbott, and Bynum independent school districts; and

(2) Hill, Johnson, Bosque, and Somervell counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.182. HOUSTON COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Houston Community College System District includes the territory within:

(1) the Houston, Alief, Katy, Spring Branch, and North Forest independent school districts;

(2) the Stafford Municipal School District;

(3) the part of the Fort Bend Independent School District that is located in the municipalities of Houston, Missouri City, and Pearland; and

(4) the part of the Fort Bend Independent School District that is not located in the service area of the Wharton County Junior College District and that is adjacent to the Houston Community College System District.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 234 (S.B. 929), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1098 (H.B. 3659), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 638 (H.B. 5330), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.183. HOWARD COUNTY JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Howard County Junior College District includes the territory within Howard, Dawson, Martin, Glasscock, Sterling, Coke, Tom Green, Concho, Irion, Schleicher, Sutton, Menard, and Kimble counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.184. KILGORE JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Kilgore Junior College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Kilgore, West Rusk, Overton, Leverett's Chapel, White Oak, Sabine, Gladewater, Big Sandy, Union Grove, Gilmer, New Diana, Spring Hill, Pine Tree, Longview, Hallsville, Henderson, Carlisle, Laneville, and Mount Enterprise independent school districts; and

(2) the Tatum Independent School District, except the part of the district that is located in Panola County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.185. LAREDO COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Laredo Community College District includes the territory within:

(1) the municipality of Laredo; and

(2) Webb, Jim Hogg, and Zapata counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.186. LEE COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Lee College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Goose Creek Consolidated Independent School District; and

(2) the Crosby, Dayton, Liberty, Barbers Hill, Anahuac, Huffman, Devers, East Chambers, Hardin, and Hull-Daisetta independent school districts.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.187. MCLENNAN COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the McLennan Community College District includes the territory within:

(1) McLennan and Falls counties; and

(2) the Calvert and Bremond independent school districts.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.188. MIDLAND COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Midland Community College District includes the territory within:

(1) Midland County, except the territory within the Greenwood Community; and

(2) Reagan, Pecos, Terrell, and Crockett counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 672 (H.B. 1374), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 130.189. NAVARRO COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Navarro College District includes the territory within Navarro, Ellis, Freestone, Limestone, and Leon counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.190. NORTH CENTRAL TEXAS COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the North Central Texas College District includes the territory within:

(1) Cooke and Montague counties;

(2) Denton County, except the territory within The Colony, the municipality of Frisco, and the Celina, Prosper, and Carrollton-Farmers Branch independent school districts; and

(3) the part of the Graham Independent School District that is located in Young County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 179), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 130.191. LONE STAR COLLEGE SYSTEM DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Lone Star College System District includes the territory within:

(1) the Aldine, Conroe, Cypress-Fairbanks, Humble, New Caney, Spring, Tomball, Magnolia, Willis, Montgomery, Splendora, Cleveland, Tarkington, and Klein independent school districts; and

(2) the Huntsville and New Waverly independent school districts in Walker County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 94, Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 11 (S.B. 386), Sec. 1, eff. April 29, 2011.

Sec. 130.192. NORTHEAST TEXAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Northeast Texas Community College District includes the territory within:

(1) Camp, Morris, and Titus counties;

(2) the Avinger and Hughes Springs independent school districts, located in Cass County;

(3) the Mount Vernon Independent School District, located in Franklin County;

(4) the Como-Pickton and Saltillo independent school districts, located in Hopkins County;

(5) the Ore City, Union Hill, and Harmony independent school districts;

(6) the Winnsboro Independent School District;

(7) the part of the Pewitt Independent School District that is located in Cass County; and

(8) the part of the Pittsburg Independent School District that is located in Upshur County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.193. ODESSA COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Odessa College District includes the territory within:

(1) Ector, Brewster, Andrews, Crane, Jeff Davis, Ward, Winkler, Presidio, Upton, Reeves, Culberson, and Loving counties; and

(2) the Seminole Independent School District in Gaines County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 672 (H.B. 1374), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 130.194. PANOLA COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Panola College District includes the territory within:

(1) Panola, Marion, and Shelby counties; and

(2) Harrison County, except the territory within the Hallsville Independent School District.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.195. PARIS JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Paris Junior College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Paris Independent School District;

(2) the part of the Prairiland Independent School District that was formerly the Cunningham School District;

(3) the municipality of Paris;

(4) Lamar and Delta counties;

(5) the Detroit and Clarksville independent school districts and the Talco-Bogata Consolidated Independent School District that is in Red River County;

(6) the North Hopkins, Sulphur Bluff, Sulphur Springs, Miller Grove, and Cumby independent school districts in Hopkins County;

(7) the Honey Grove Consolidated Independent School District in Fannin County;

(8) the Fannindel Independent School District, located in Fannin and Delta counties;

(9) Hunt County, except the part of the county that is located in the Terrell Independent School District; and

(10) the part of the Prairiland Independent School District that is located in Red River County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.196. RANGER JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Ranger Junior College District includes the territory within:

(1) the part of the Ranger Independent School District that is located in Eastland County, except the area that is known as the old Bullock School Land; and

(2) Comanche, Brown, Erath, and Young counties, except for the part of the Graham Independent School District that is located in Young County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 560 (H.B. 1274), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 130.197. SAN JACINTO COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the San Jacinto College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Pasadena, La Porte, Deer Park, Channelview, Galena Park, and Sheldon independent school districts; and

(2) the part of the Clear Creek Independent School District that is located in Harris County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.198. SOUTH PLAINS COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the South Plains College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Whiteface Consolidated Independent School District;

(2) Bailey, Lamb, Hale, Floyd, Motley, Cochran, Hockley, Lubbock, Crosby, Yoakum, Terry, Lynn, and Garza counties; and

(3) Gaines County, except the territory within the Seminole Independent School District.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.199. SOUTH TEXAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the South Texas Community College District includes the territory within Hidalgo and Starr counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.200. SOUTHWEST TEXAS JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Southwest Texas Junior College District includes the territory within Zavala, Uvalde, Real, Dimmit, Frio, Kinney, La Salle, Maverick, Medina, Val Verde, and Edwards counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.201. TARRANT COUNTY JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Tarrant County Junior College District includes the territory within Tarrant County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.202. TEMPLE JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Temple Junior College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Temple Independent School District;

(2) the municipality of Temple;

(3) the Academy, Bartlett, Belton, Holland, Rogers, Troy, and Salado independent school districts located in Bell County;

(4) the Buckholts, Cameron, Rockdale, and Thorndale independent school districts located in Milam County;

(5) the Granger, Hutto, Taylor, and Thrall independent school districts located in Williamson County;

(6) the part of the Rosebud-Lott Independent School District that is located in Milam County; and

(7) the part of the Bartlett Independent School District that is located in Milam County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 523, Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 173, Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2001.

Sec. 130.203. TEXARKANA COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Texarkana College District includes the territory within:

(1) the taxing district, which includes all of Bowie County;

(2) Cass County, except the territory within the Hughes Springs, Avinger, and Pewitt independent school districts; and

(3) the Avery Independent School District located in Red River County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 825 (S.B. 1855), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 130.204. TEXAS SOUTHMOST COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Texas Southmost College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Brownsville, Los Fresnos Consolidated, and Point Isabel independent school districts; and

(2) Cameron and Willacy counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.205. TRINITY VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Trinity Valley Community College District includes the territory within:

(1) the part of the Terrell Independent School District located in Hunt County;

(2) Anderson, Henderson, Kaufman, and Rains counties; and

(3) Van Zandt County, except the territory within the Grand Saline, Lindale, and Van independent school districts.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.206. TYLER JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Tyler Junior College District includes the territory within:

(1) the Chapel Hill, Grand Saline, Lindale, Tyler, Yantis, Winona, Alba-Golden, Arp, Bullard, Hawkins, Jacksonville, Mineola, New Summerfield, Quitman, Rusk, Troup, and Whitehouse independent school districts; and

(2) the Van Independent School District, except the part of the district that is located in Henderson County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.207. VERNON REGIONAL JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Vernon Regional Junior College District includes the territory within Wilbarger, Archer, Baylor, Clay, Cottle, Foard, Hardeman, Haskell, King, Knox, Throckmorton, and Wichita counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.208. THE VICTORIA COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of The Victoria College District includes the territory within:

(1) Victoria, Lavaca, DeWitt, Gonzales, and Calhoun counties;

(2) Jackson County, except the territory within the Ganado Independent School District; and

(3) Refugio County, except the territory within the Woodsboro Independent School District.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 572, Sec. 2, eff. June 11, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 601 (S.B. 495), Sec. 3, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 130.209. WEATHERFORD COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Weatherford College District includes the territory within Hood, Parker, Wise, Jack, and Palo Pinto counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 45 (H.B. 407), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 130.210. WESTERN TEXAS COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Western Texas College District includes the territory within Scurry, Fisher, Jones, Nolan, Runnels, Dickens, Stonewall, Borden, Mitchell, and Kent counties.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 130.211. WHARTON COUNTY JUNIOR COLLEGE DISTRICT SERVICE AREA. The service area of the Wharton County Junior College District includes the territory within:

(1) Wharton County;

(2) the Needville Independent School District in Fort Bend County;

(3) the Wallis-Orchard Independent School District located in Austin County;

(4) the Columbus and Weimer independent school districts located in Colorado County;

(5) the Rice Consolidated Independent School District located in Colorado County;

(6) the Kendleton and Lamar independent school districts located in Fort Bend County;

(7) the Bay City, Boling, Matagorda, Palacios, Tidehaven, and Van Vleck independent school districts located in Matagorda County;

(8) the Ganado Independent School District located in Jackson County; and

(9) the incorporated area and extraterritorial jurisdiction of the City of Sugar Land located in Fort Bend County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1211 (H.B. 776), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER K. BRANCH CAMPUSES

Sec. 130.251. BRANCH CAMPUSES. (a) The board of trustees of a junior college district may establish and operate branch campuses, centers, or extension facilities within the junior college district's service area, provided that each branch campus, center, or extension facility and each course or program offered in such locations is subject to the prior and continuing approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(b) Such branch campuses, centers, or extension facilities shall be within the role and scope of the junior college as determined by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(c) The board of trustees of a junior college district may accept or acquire by purchase or rent land and facilities in the name of the junior college district within the junior college district's service area.

(d) Before any course may be offered by a public junior college within the service area of another operating public junior college, it must be established that the second public junior college is not capable of or is unable to offer the course. After the need is established and the course is not locally available, then the first public junior college may offer the course when approval is granted by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(d-1) Subsection (d) does not apply to a course offered by a public junior college with a service area located wholly or partly in a county with a population of more than three million for high school students enrolled in a school district located wholly or partly in a county with a population of more than three million.

(e) The board of trustees of a junior college district may enter cooperative agreement with independent, common, or county school districts, state or federal agencies as may be required to perform the services as outlined in this section.

(f) Notwithstanding Subchapter J, the service area of a junior college district does not include territory within the boundaries of the taxing district of another junior college district. If a branch campus, center, or extension facility operated by a junior college district outside its taxing district becomes located within the taxing district of another junior college district when the other district is established or annexes the territory that includes the campus, center, or facility, the junior college district operating the campus, center, or facility must discontinue the campus, center, or facility within a reasonable period, not to exceed one academic year. The junior college district in which the campus, center, or facility is located must fairly compensate the junior college district that discontinues the campus, center, or facility for any capital improvements that the discontinuing district acquired or constructed for the campus, center, or facility, to the extent the discontinuing district is otherwise unable to recover the current value of its investment in that capital improvement, as determined by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(g) Subsections (a) and (c) do not apply to a branch campus, center, or extension facility that is established before September 1, 1999.

(h) This section does not affect the authority of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board regarding the continued operation of a branch campus, center, or extension facility.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3350, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 2035, ch. 673, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 1975; Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 2109, ch. 689, Sec. 1 to 4, eff. June 20, 1975; Acts 1990, 71st Leg., 6th C.S., ch. 32, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1990; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1424, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1177 (S.B. 1004), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.086 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1242 (H.B. 382), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 130.252. SECURITY FOR REVENUE BONDS ISSUED FOR BRANCH CAMPUS, CENTER, OR EXTENSION FACILITY. Bonds payable from revenue and issued by the governing body of a county or school district to finance the purchase of land or the construction of a facility to be used for a branch campus, center, or extension facility authorized under Section 130.251 may be secured by a trust indenture, a deed of trust, or a mortgage granting a security interest in the applicable land or facility.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 357 (H.B. 2474), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0865 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1242 (H.B. 382), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 130.253. BRANCH CAMPUS MAINTENANCE TAX. (a) The governing body of a school district or a county may levy a junior college district branch campus maintenance tax as provided by this section at a rate not to exceed five cents on each $100 valuation of all taxable property in its jurisdiction.

(b) On presentation of a petition for an election to authorize a junior college district branch campus maintenance tax signed by not fewer than five percent of the qualified voters of the jurisdiction in which the proposed tax is to be levied, the governing body of the school district or county, as applicable, shall determine the legality and the genuineness of the petition and, if it is determined to be legal and genuine, forward the petition to the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board. The governing body of a county with a population of 150,000 or less, on completion of a needs assessment analysis showing adequate need and on approval by the coordinating board, on its own motion and without the presentation of a petition, may propose an election to authorize a branch campus maintenance tax.

(c) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall determine whether the requirements provided by Subsections (a) and (b) have been satisfied and whether the proposed tax is feasible and desirable under the coordinating board's rules for junior colleges. In making its decision on the feasibility and desirability of the tax, the coordinating board shall consider the needs of the junior college, the needs of the community or communities served by the branch campus, and the welfare of the state as a whole. The commissioner of higher education shall deliver to the governing body of the school district or county, as applicable, the order of the coordinating board authorizing or denying further action in the levying of a junior college district branch campus maintenance tax.

(d) If the coordinating board approves the establishment of the junior college district branch campus maintenance tax, the governing body of the school district or county, as applicable, shall enter an order for an election to be held in the territory under its jurisdiction not less than 20 days nor more than 60 days after the date on which the order is entered to determine whether the junior college district branch campus maintenance tax may be levied. In the case of joint school district or joint county elections, by mutual agreement of the governing bodies, the elections shall be held on the same date throughout the jurisdictions.

(e) The president of the board of trustees of the school district or the county judge, as applicable, shall give notice of the election in the manner provided by law for notice by the county judge of general elections.

(f) The governing body of the school district or county, as applicable, shall procure the election supplies necessary to conduct the election and shall determine the quantity of the various types of supplies to be provided for use at each precinct polling place and early voting polling place.

(g) Any qualified voter residing within the boundaries of the jurisdiction in which the tax may be levied is entitled to vote at the election.

(h) The ballot shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "The levy of a junior college district branch campus maintenance tax in an amount not to exceed (insert a number not higher than five) cents on each $100 valuation of all taxable property in __________." (insert name of school district or name of county, as applicable).

(i) To be adopted, the measure must receive a favorable vote of a majority of those voting on the measure.

(j) Not later than the 10th day after the date of the election, the governing body shall canvass the returns of the election and shall enter an order declaring the result of the election.

(k) The proceeds of the junior college district branch campus maintenance tax may be used only as follows:

(1) to operate and maintain a junior college district branch campus and support its programs and services in the area of the political subdivision that levied the tax; and

(2) under an agreement by the applicable junior college district and the political subdivision levying the tax, to make lease payments to the political subdivision for facilities used exclusively by the branch campus that are owned by the political subdivision.

(l) The governing body of the school district or county approving the junior college district branch campus maintenance tax shall set the tax levy.

(m) The junior college district shall maintain and furnish any records and reports required by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board. The reports shall be made available routinely to the governing body of the jurisdiction in which the tax is levied, and to members of the general public on request.

(n) This section does not affect the authority of any jurisdiction levying a junior college district branch campus maintenance tax to create a junior college district in the jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 2193, ch. 409, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 136, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.78; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 776, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1424, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 357 (H.B. 2474), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.087 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1242 (H.B. 382), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 130.254. SOUTH TEXAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT; INSTRUCTIONAL PROGRAMS IN EDCOUCH OR ELSA. The board of trustees of the South Texas Community College District shall adopt and implement a plan to expand opportunity for instructional programs consisting of postsecondary courses leading to an associate degree offered in a classroom setting within the corporate limits of the municipality of Edcouch or Elsa. Any instructional program provided under this section is subject to the requirements of Section 130.251.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1242 (H.B. 382), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER L. BACCALAUREATE DEGREE PROGRAMS

Sec. 130.301. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(2) "General academic teaching institution," "medical and dental unit," and "institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012(l) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 130.302. BACCALAUREATE DEGREE PROGRAMS; GENERAL AUTHORIZATION. The coordinating board may authorize public junior colleges to offer baccalaureate degree programs as provided by this subchapter. Offering a baccalaureate degree program under this subchapter does not otherwise alter the role and mission of a public junior college.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012(a) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 3, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 130.303. AUTHORIZATION FOR CERTAIN BACCALAUREATE DEGREE PROGRAMS. (a) The coordinating board shall authorize baccalaureate degree programs in the fields of applied science, applied technology, and nursing at each public junior college that previously participated in a pilot project to offer baccalaureate degree programs.

(b) The coordinating board may authorize baccalaureate degree programs at one or more public junior colleges that offer a degree program in the field of applied science, including a degree program in the field of applied science with an emphasis in early childhood education, applied technology, or nursing and have demonstrated a workforce need.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012(b) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 4, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 130.304. BACCALAUREATE IN DENTAL HYGIENE. (a) The coordinating board shall authorize baccalaureate degree programs in the field of dental hygiene at a public junior college that offers a degree program in that field, has a main campus located in the county seat of a county with a population greater than 200,000, and includes territory in at least six public school districts located in two counties.

(b) Expired.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 5, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 130.305. ACCREDITATION. A public junior college offering a baccalaureate degree program under this subchapter must meet all applicable accreditation requirements of the Commission on Colleges of the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012(c) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 6, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 130.306. LIMITATION. (a) A public junior college offering a baccalaureate degree program under this subchapter may not offer more than five baccalaureate degree programs at any time.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 900 (H.B. 3348), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2021.

(c) Degree programs offered under this subchapter are subject to the continuing approval of the coordinating board.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012(d) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 7, eff. June 12, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 900 (H.B. 3348), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 900 (H.B. 3348), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2021.

Sec. 130.307. REQUIREMENTS. (a) In determining whether a public junior college may offer baccalaureate degree programs and what degree programs may be offered, the coordinating board shall:

(1) apply the same criteria and standards the coordinating board uses to approve baccalaureate degree programs at general academic teaching institutions and medical and dental units; and

(2) consider the following factors:

(A) the workforce need for the degree programs in the region served by the junior college;

(B) how those degree programs would complement the other programs and course offerings of the junior college and whether the associate degree program offered by the junior college in the same field has been successful;

(C) whether those degree programs would unnecessarily duplicate the degree programs offered by other institutions of higher education; and

(D) the ability of the junior college to support the degree programs with student enrollment and the adequacy of the junior college's facilities, faculty, administration, libraries, and other resources.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (b-1), a public junior college may offer a baccalaureate degree program under this subchapter only if its junior college district:

(1) had a taxable property valuation amount of not less than $6 billion in the preceding year; and

(2) received a positive assessment of the overall financial health of the district as reported by the coordinating board.

(b-1) The requirement of Subsection (b)(1) does not apply to a public junior college for the purpose of offering a baccalaureate degree program in nursing approved under Section 130.308 if its junior college district:

(1) has a taxable property valuation amount of not less than $4 billion in the preceding year; and

(2) does not have a four-year institution of higher education located in a county in which the district is located.

(c) Before a public junior college may be authorized to offer a baccalaureate degree program under this subchapter, the public junior college must submit a report to the coordinating board that includes:

(1) a long-term financial plan for receiving accreditation from the Commission on Colleges of the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools;

(2) a long-term plan for faculty recruitment that:

(A) indicates the ability to pay the increased salaries of doctoral faculty;

(B) identifies recruitment strategies for new faculty; and

(C) ensures the program would not draw faculty employed by a neighboring institution offering a similar program;

(3) detailed information on the manner of program and course delivery; and

(4) detailed information regarding existing articulation agreements and dual enrollment agreements indicating:

(A) that at least three articulation agreements have been established with general academic teaching institutions or medical and dental units, or the reasons why no articulation agreements have been established; and

(B) that, with the agreement of the applicable general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit, established articulation agreements are at capacity.

(d) The coordinating board may not authorize a public junior college to offer a baccalaureate degree in a field if articulation agreements with general academic teaching institutions or medical and dental units are sufficient to meet the needs of that field.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012(e) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 8, eff. June 12, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 640 (H.B. 885), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2021.

Sec. 130.308. SPECIAL REQUIREMENTS FOR NURSING DEGREE PROGRAM. (a) In determining whether a public junior college may offer a baccalaureate degree program in nursing, the coordinating board shall:

(1) require a public junior college to provide evidence to the coordinating board and the Texas Board of Nursing that the public junior college has secured adequate long-term clinical space;

(2) obtain a letter from each clinical site provided indicating that the clinical site has not refused a similar request from a general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit; and

(3) establish that the corresponding associate degree program offered by the public junior college has been successful as indicated by job placement rates and licensing exam scores.

(b) A baccalaureate degree program offered under this subchapter by a public junior college in the field of nursing must:

(1) be a bachelor of science degree program;

(2) meet the standards and criteria the Texas Board of Nursing uses to approve pre-licensure degree programs at general academic teaching institutions and medical and dental units regardless of whether the program is a pre-licensure or post-licensure program; and

(3) be accredited by a national nursing accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of Education.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 9, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 130.309. ARTICULATION AGREEMENT REQUIRED. (a) Each public junior college that offers a baccalaureate degree program under this subchapter must enter into an articulation agreement for the first five years of the program with one or more general academic teaching institutions or medical and dental units to ensure that students enrolled in the degree program have an opportunity to complete the degree if the public junior college ceases to offer the degree program. The coordinating board may require a general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit that offers a comparable degree program to enter into an articulation agreement with the public junior college as provided by this subsection.

(b) The coordinating board shall prescribe procedures to ensure that each public junior college that offers a degree program under this subchapter informs each student who enrolls in the degree program of the articulation agreement entered into under this section for the student's degree program.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 50, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1201, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1397 (H.B. 2198), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 674 (H.B. 2425), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 4.013, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1155 (S.B. 215), Sec. 60, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1112 (H.B. 3348), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 10, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 130.310. FUNDING. (a) A degree program created under this subchapter shall be funded solely by a public junior college's allocation of state appropriations under this chapter and Chapter 130A, local funds, and private sources. The coordinating board shall weigh contact hours attributable to students enrolled in a junior-level or senior-level course offered under this subchapter used to determine a public junior college's allocation of state appropriations under this chapter and Chapter 130A in the same manner as a lower division course in a corresponding field.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 52, eff. September 1, 2023.

(c) A public junior college may not charge a student enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program offered under this subchapter tuition and fees in an amount that exceeds the amount of tuition and fees charged by the junior college to a similarly situated student who is enrolled in an associate degree program in a corresponding field. This subsection does not apply to tuition and fees charged for a baccalaureate degree program in the field of applied science or applied technology previously offered as part of a pilot project and offered by a public junior college authorized to offer baccalaureate degree programs under Section 130.303(a).

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012(g) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 11, eff. June 12, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 42, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 52, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.311. REPORT. Each biennium, each public junior college offering a baccalaureate degree program under this subchapter shall conduct a review of each baccalaureate degree program offered and prepare a report on the operation, quality, and effectiveness of those degree programs. A copy of the report shall be delivered to the coordinating board in the form and at the time determined by the coordinating board.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012(h) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 12, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 130.312. RULES. The coordinating board shall adopt rules as necessary for the administration of this subchapter.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.0012(k) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 2118), Sec. 13, eff. June 12, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER M. WORKFORCE CONTINUING EDUCATION

Sec. 130.351. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Adult" means a person who:

(A) has completed the person's sophomore year of high school;

(B) is 17 years of age and has been awarded a high school diploma or its equivalent; or

(C) is 18 years of age or older, regardless of the person's previous educational experience.

(2) "Avocational course" means a course of study in a subject or activity that is usually engaged in by a person in addition to the person's regular work or profession for recreation or in relation to a hobby. The term includes a community interest course.

(3) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(4) "Workforce continuing education" means a program of instruction that:

(A) is designed primarily for adults; and

(B) is intended, on completion by a participant, to prepare the participant to qualify to apply for and accept an employment offer or a job upgrade within a specific occupational category or to bring the participant's knowledge or skills up to date on new developments in a particular occupation or profession.

(5) "Workforce continuing education course" means a course of instruction in workforce continuing education that is approved by the coordinating board. The term does not include an avocational course.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 510 (H.B. 2994), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 130.301 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 130.352. FORMULA FUNDING FOR WORKFORCE CONTINUING EDUCATION COURSES. Notwithstanding Section 130.003 or any other law, contact hours attributable to the enrollment of a student in a workforce continuing education course offered by a public junior college shall be included in the contact hours used to determine the college's allocation of state money appropriated and distributed to public junior colleges under this chapter and Chapter 130A, regardless of whether the college waives all or part of the tuition or fees for the course under Section 130.354.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 510 (H.B. 2994), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.302 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.002(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 130.302 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 43, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 130.353. WORKFORCE CONTINUING EDUCATION FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS. (a) A public junior college may offer, or may enter into an agreement with a school district, organization, or other person that operates a high school to offer, workforce continuing education courses other than learning framework courses, basic employability courses, and basic learning skills courses to a person who:

(1) is enrolled in high school on the completion of the person's sophomore year;

(2) is enrolled in a school that is not formally organized as a high school and is at least 16 years of age; or

(3) is attending high school while incarcerated, is at least 16 years of age, and is not eligible for release from incarceration before the person's 18th birthday.

(b) This section does not prohibit a public junior college from offering community interest continuing education courses using local funds.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 130.303 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 130.354. WAIVER OF TUITION AND FEES FOR WORKFORCE CONTINUING EDUCATION COURSES. A public junior college may waive all or part of the tuition or fees charged to a student for a workforce continuing education course only if:

(1) the student:

(A) is enrolled in high school or in a school described by Section 130.353(a)(2);

(B) is 16 years of age or older, has had the disabilities of minority removed, and is not enrolled in secondary education; or

(C) is under the age of 18 and is incarcerated;

(2) all or a significant portion of the college's costs for facilities, instructor salaries, equipment, and other expenses for the course are covered by business, industry, or other local public or private entities; or

(3) the course is taught in a federal correctional facility and the facilities, equipment, supplies, and other expenses for the course are funded by the federal government.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 510 (H.B. 2994), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 130.304 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.002(3), eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 130.304 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 130.355. RULES. The coordinating board shall adopt any rules the coordinating board considers necessary for the administration of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 510 (H.B. 2994), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 130.305 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 44, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER O. OPPORTUNITY HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA PROGRAM

Sec. 130.451. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(2) "General academic teaching institution" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(3) "Program," unless the context indicates otherwise, means the Opportunity High School Diploma program established under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 45, eff. June 9, 2023.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2139), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 130.452. PURPOSE. The purpose of the program is to provide an alternative means by which adult students enrolled in a workforce education program at a public junior college may earn a high school diploma at the college through concurrent enrollment in a competency-based education program that enables students to demonstrate knowledge substantially equivalent to the knowledge required to earn a high school diploma in this state.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 45, eff. June 9, 2023.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2139), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 130.453. ADMINISTRATION. The coordinating board shall administer the program in consultation with the Texas Education Agency and the Texas Workforce Commission.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 45, eff. June 9, 2023.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2139), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 130.454. APPROVAL OF ALTERNATIVE HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA PROGRAM. (a) A public junior college may submit to the coordinating board an application to participate in the program. The application must propose an alternative competency-based high school diploma program to be offered for concurrent enrollment to adult students without a high school diploma who are enrolled in a workforce education program at the college. The proposed program may include any combination of instruction, curriculum, achievement, internships, or other means by which a student may attain knowledge sufficient to adequately prepare the student for postsecondary education or additional workforce education.

(b) A public junior college may submit an application under Subsection (a) together with one or more public junior colleges, general academic teaching institutions, public school districts, or nonprofit organizations with whom the proposed program described by that subsection will be offered as provided by Subsection (e).

(c) The coordinating board may approve not more than five public junior colleges to participate in the program.

(d) Subject to Subsection (c), the coordinating board shall review and approve a public junior college's application to participate in the program if the board determines that the college's proposed program described by Subsection (a) will provide instruction and assessments appropriate to ensure that a student who successfully completes the proposed program demonstrates levels of knowledge sufficient to adequately prepare the student for postsecondary education or additional workforce education. The coordinating board may coordinate with the Texas Education Agency as necessary to make a determination under this subsection.

(e) A public junior college approved to participate in the program may:

(1) enter into an agreement with one or more public junior colleges, general academic teaching institutions, public school districts, or nonprofit organizations to offer the program described by Subsection (a); and

(2) offer the program described by Subsection (a) at any campus of the college or an entity with which the college has entered into an agreement under Subdivision (1).

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 45, eff. June 9, 2023.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2139), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 130.455. AWARD OF HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA. (a) A public junior college participating in the program may award a high school diploma to a student enrolled in the alternative competency-based high school diploma program offered by the college under the program if the student performs satisfactorily on assessment instruments prescribed by coordinating board rule.

(b) A high school diploma awarded under the program is equivalent to a high school diploma awarded under Section 28.025.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 45, eff. June 9, 2023.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2139), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 130.456. FUNDING. (a) The coordinating board and the Texas Workforce Commission shall coordinate to jointly identify funding mechanisms, including grants, interagency contracts, financial aid, or subsidies, available to public junior colleges and students to encourage and facilitate participation in the program.

(b) A public junior college participating in the program is entitled to receive funding under Section 130.003 for the program in the manner provided by coordinating board rule.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 45, eff. June 9, 2023.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2139), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 130.457. REPORT. Not later than December 1, 2026, the coordinating board shall submit to the legislature a progress report on the effectiveness of the program and any recommendations for legislative or other action. This section expires September 1, 2027.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 45, eff. June 9, 2023.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2139), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 130.458. RULES. The coordinating board may adopt rules as necessary to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 45, eff. June 9, 2023.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2139), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.